LAKEHURST, N.J. -- Toms River Police Officer Bruno Agnoli, Badge No. 2, was sitting in his father's home, putting on his shoes when the four-bedroom farmhouse began to shudder.
"There were a lot of exciting people who were brought into Terry's vision of doing things."
Am I the only one seeing more and more "double dogs" on walks? they may not be the same breed or size, and in fact most often, they're not. But they're together.
Clearly those are the things that appealed to Glenn Close, who played a version of this character in a stage play decades ago (it’s based on a story by the Irish writer George Moore), pursued it as a producer, worked on the script and stars as Albert.
Gil Derose, who lives across the street on Fela Drive, and Nick Ricciardi, who lives down the road, said they plan on attending the trial in New Brunswick before Superior Court Judge Bradley Ferencz. Neither witnessed the attack on their neighbor.
Then there are visitors who lack commmon sense.
Breen expects the charter school to enroll a minimum of 50 and a maximum of 100 by the start of school late in the summer.
Some officials have said that things have gotten worse this year since half the police force was laid off in January.
May 04, 2012 02:21 PM EDT
5. With black pen, mark dots on the suitcase where the drill holes are located on each top plate. This will make it easier to attach the legs into the suitcase.
A coalition of environmental groups led by Food and Water Watch is rallying against the plant. For now, it's focused on the Oregon Department of Water Resources, which put ODFW's water exchange application out for public comment earlier this week.
"Watching Kyrie the other day get hit, my heart dropped all the way to the floor,'' Scott said. "I don't want the same situation with Andy, and I think Andy's injury is a lot easier right now for it to happen again than Kyrie's is. I would like to shut down Kyrie's as well, but both those guys want to play. That's their competitive nature. Who am I as a coach to say, 'I don't want you to play.' The one thing I do love about the guys we have is they want to compete, and I never want to take that away from them.''
Nor did Davis refer to Wiles' involvement in the theft of state and federal building materials by his former supervisor, Brian Liebich, as reported by the federal investigator in a recent report. Caltrans also fired Liebich in November.
“Everything is good and ready to go,” Holland said. “I got back to doing the things, mechanically, that I was doing last year. I don’t know if I was guarding my side, but I was getting away from my delivery and getting out of it too quickly. I was falling off (to the side), and falling off early (in his delivery).”
Counterpoint: Amanda Marcotte
A new concern arose this spring when the North Fork Fire sparked in late March near the river, although it's not expected to impact the South Platte directly. Most of the drainages in the area affected by the fire are intermittent and don't feed directly into the river.
Also, PSE&G is paying $4.8 million for energy efficiency improvements at the Saint Peter’s University Hospital for additional savings in energy costs, The hospital must pay back 20 percent of that cost over three years.
Alexander Murphy, UO geography professor, said the board sent a clear message:
Maybe this bracket was a gift to Duke because of Coach K’s technical foul Saturday afternoon in the ACC Tournament. Not even No. 1 overall seed Kansas has this easy a road to Indianapolis. First, the Blue Devils get the winner of the Winthrop vs. Arkansas-Pine Bluff play-in game. Then the winner of the underachiever’s game, Cal-Louisville? Did the Selection Committee even try to put a speed bump in Duke’s path to Indy?
"Their job is to kind of weave it together according to the president's direction. Then he takes it and makes it his," said Cecilia Munoz, director of the Domestic Policy Council.
CAMDEN — The Delaware River Port Authority gave PATCO rail riders a gift for the new year. But drivers who cross its bridges will not be so lucky.
7 ounces cooked lobster meat, chopped
Maritime Sirinant, from China, Tianjin at Longview Berth
Director, Pos. 2 - 4 Yr. Term
They had lunch in the council chambers. Afterward, they had a mock council meeting. The boys debated whether to allow staff to dress down for Casual Day Thursday. Casual Day Friday was canceled when the city went to a four 10-hour days schedule. Christopher and Brody approved the idea while Damian opposed it, saying that city officials work four days a week so there was no need to make one day casual.
Bar Majestic owner Joseph Castro said he is proud of his neighborhood and doesn’t think Snooki’s and JWoww’s presence will sully the city’s reputation.
The willingness of Indiana, led by a Republican governor and GOP-controlled Legislature, to challenge the federal government and risk a huge financial penalty could take the issue into uncharted legal and political territory.
PALM BEACH, Fla. — As they prepared to introduce Tim Tebow at a press conference in New Jersey this afternoon, the Jets seemingly put Mark Sanchez on notice yesterday.
The challenge for sushi places is that dishes that were once so creative become de rigueur. Menus often aren't updated to reflect the seasonality of fish or produce.
Candidates for the Hall of Fame were nominated by experts in five categories -- historical, general, arts and entertainment, sports and enterprise. The selection process also includes public voting at the Hall of Fame website: njhalloffame.org.
Much has been written and said recently about the First Amendment and freedom of religion in the context of the current political atmosphere. Many of the most provocative comments have been about contraception, abortion rights and health insurance. Some politicians and pundits claim that President Barack Obama is attacking religion or religious institutions. Presidential hopeful Rick Santorum stoked the fires by criticizing the 1960 speech given by John F. Kennedy when he ran for president. Kennedy, trying to become the first Roman Catholic president, said that he favored the "absolute" separation of church and state. (Unsuccessful Catholic candidate Al Smith had given a similar speech in 1928.)
The main Senate sponsor, Judiciary Committee chairman Patrick Leahy, D-Vt., said he respected Reid's decision to postpone the vote but lamented the Senate's unwillingness to debate the bill.
A: Furnace Creek in Death Valley recorded a temperature of 134 on July 10, 1913, the highest ever recorded.
More than 30 months removed from his last reception, Burress is looking to pick up where he left off. In his last two full seasons, he averaged more than 1,000 yards receiving and scored 22 touchdowns.
David Zulawski, chairman of Wicklander-Zulawski & Assocs., the firm that hires out Tessmann and Pavletic for state-sponsored courses, expressed confidence in the men and questioned Rivera's innocence.
The biggest surprise might not have been how good were the newcomers, with seven new starters on defense and seven on offense because of disciplinary suspensions. Ohio State is always going to have a lot of good players.
Damian Buchwald of Buffalo, N.Y., picked up a second job earlier this year. His new work schedule has helped pay the bills but leaves him without time to travel to Connecticut to spend the holiday with his wife's family.
Brown back as senior for Barat Academy
Trotwood (Ohio) Madison linebacker Mike McCray not only earned an invitation to Beaverton, but was also named linebacker MVP at the camp. A 6-foot-4, 230-pounder, more known for his big hits than his pass coverage, McCray showed that hes capable of dropping back into coverage.
The Orioles were leading, 3-1, and Hughes was feeling pretty good about himself as he quickly got the first two outs of the sixth. He then hit Matt Wieters. That was enough for Girardi, who didn’t want to tempt fate and have the right-hander face Davis again.
The auto club said today the average is about 2 cents per gallon less than last year at this time.
This budget contains $1.1 billion for the state’s pension contribution. This is an increase of $587 million over last year’s contribution. This amount represents 3.42% of our entire state budget this year. In terms of absolute dollars, it is the single largest state contribution ever.
But that loss of income tax revenue would hit a budget that also has to absorb Christie’s prior commitment to increase the annual payment into the state pension system.
World Series champions stumbled through September and landed in the AL wild-card spot.
vs.
øThe gold standard has other problems:
Every so often, the furiously hot seas covering the sun erupt, blasting a geyser of plasma through the solar system.
6. Jossel's menu is superb. Did I mention that before? It deserves to be mentioned again, because his lusty cooking gives the place its soul.
I once was an accomplished palm reader. I stopped because it seemed like an invasion of privacy when people gazed at me with wide-eyed innocence, palms forward, seeking insight into their true selves. I asked Ketut, "May I read your palm?" He smiled, and then came a look of pure innocence as he presented his hands to me.
Fornatale died in New York a week after suffering a stroke, his son, Peter Thomas Fornatale, told The Associated Press.
TRENTON — Gov. Chris Christie is the new kid on the block, intrigued by the promise of a bigger and better job, poised to make a decision that will forever alter his life.
St. John Properties declined to comment through a spokesman. Adler did not respond to requests for comment. Barhight declined to comment.
Here is what some of the Windy City pundits thought of the hiring:
Soprano Dominique Labelle sang with tender fluency, especially in the wonderful showpiece "The Prince unable to conceal his pain," which concludes the first half. Tenor Dann Coakwell, tasked with much of the narration as well as a handful of evocative arias, dispatched his assignment with sweet tone and rhythmic alertness, if also the occasional lapse in intonation. Baritone Philip Cutlip made fine work of his two arias, and the Philharmonia Chorale, led by Bruce Lamott, sang with clarity and vigor.
"That guy I raced for the lead, he wore the right-front corner of my nose out diving across it a couple of times," Stewart said of Edwards. "If I were that kid, I would have done exactly the same thing.
Last spring, Hall's committee was the scene of hearings on a bill opening state parkland to possible oil and gas drilling. Environmental groups packed the hearing room with opponents testifying into the early morning, but the bill passed Hall's committee -- even over the objection of the state Department of Natural Resources.
Pat Dooley, the sports columnist of the Gainesville Sun, was coaching in the spring game for the second consecutive season. When it was pointed out that Dooley's UF coaching tenure had now lasted longer than that of former offensive coordinator Charlie Weis, Muschamp cracked: "Hopefully, he can score more points."
At Wednesday's opening Callow seemed a bit off the top of his game early in the first act, but was in fine form by the second. The show's sound design (a low hum of music and effects underscoring many speeches) was often distracting.
Yet, in the face of such horror, McShane’s family have remained unshakable in their love and fierce dedication to the 25-year-old woman who once dreamed of a career in urban planning. And that became the focus of the story in Wednesday’s Chicago Tribune.
"But opening day, he was so excited. And I think the attitude you saw him display all year, that was the attitude of all the players on opening day. What you saw opening day was what you saw in mid-June, July, August and September."
Injuries suffered by Rockies starting pitchers Drew Pomeranz and Jeremy Guthie do not appear as serious as first thought.
The drop in Europe came after a long Easter weekend. Tuesday was many investors' first chance to react to disappointing U.S. jobs data. As well, on Monday, Spain's government announced €10 billion of spending cuts in health and education.
One such idea proposed by Alaya was to incorporate the mural somehow into events held there, be it by someone explaining why all that appears in the mural is up there or by brochure, as suggested by FiberArts owner Carol Moore.
"No great city can thrive by shrinking. The best way to keep people from leaving is to attract the jobs that give them a good reason to stay," Emanuel said. "The jobs of tomorrow will go to those cities that produce the workforce of tomorrow."
The answer to a large degree depends on whom you ask. Investors, academics, gambling addicts and psychologists all have their own take. Neurologists have their own observations about pleasure centers in the brain. A common thread runs through the different opinions: We get in trouble when we trade for thrills.
"What they're doing is forcing a government, one-size-fits-all preschool industry and killing the private industry," she said.
Sarah Palin, who now says she is "seriously considering" a White House run, was one of the few Republicans who came to Gingrich's defense -- though a rather odd defense it was. She said he had been attacked by the "lamestream leftist media," a predictable, but rather inaccurate choice of words since it was the likes of Rush Limbaugh and Charles Krauthammer who delivered most of the body blows to Gingrich. But Palin also criticized the former speaker for not standing by his original critique of Ryan. "We should ignore . . . criticism of what it is that we say in an interview if we believe what it is that we say. Don't let them, in a 24-hour news cycle, make us change our positions," she told Fox's Sean Hannity. Gingrich's contention, of course, is that he didn't really believe what he said and that he really supports Ryan's approach.
(8:11:55 PM): Glencoe 13, Hillsboro 6, 2:30 2nd Q: Apeland to Elford for the 16-yard TD.
W — Not reported.L — Brett- schneider, 3 IP, 6 runs, 4 hits, 2 K's, 2 BBs. Highlights — Webber, D, 2-for-3; Chesire, D, 2-for-4, run scored.
What seemingly countless creatures are at home in the Wekiva River's woods, wetlands and prairies, and in the sky above the river, the aquifer below it and in its realms that are invisible to the human eye?
"I'm speechless," he said. "I've always played hard … but it's nice to get recognized for academics."
The question-and-answer session followed a 15-minute speech that marked Christie’s continued ascent in the national Republican Party. Christie walked into the room with Nancy Reagan and, speaking to an audience of about 900 people, frequently invoked the leadership of President Ronald Reagan while extolling his own work in the Trenton Statehouse.
Concepcion managed Lincoln Financial Advisors' offices in Cleveland and Columbus and was also a financial adviser when he was terminated in August 2008. He had worked at Lincoln or its predecessor for almost 23 years, he said.
Duke vs. Butler, Dec. 4
Firefighters left the scene at 6:07 p.m., the director said.
Obama's trouble spots: independent voters and men. Independents in Ohio prefer Romney, the former Massachusetts governor, over Obama, 43-38 percent. Ohio men prefer Romney, 48-38.
"I just want to simplify, simplify, simplify. I think you get to a stage in life where you really want to make for a lighter footprint."
Pro-julep: What's a margarita? A 24-ounce salt-rimmed acid bomb served in a hurricane glass at Chili's.
Such people, Martin Luther King once observed, mistake silence for peace. Silence is not peace.
TIP 6: Buy your peanuts ahead of time. The Angels concession stands sell a 4-ounce bag for $2.50 and an 11-ounce bag for $6. Albertsons sells a 12-ounce bag (with an Angels logo) for $1.69. Even your second-grader can do that math.
Tickets: U-M will not have a public sale. Season-ticket holders were granted priority access to pre-reserve tickets and the allotment sold out. Other options are calling 877-NCAA-TIX or buying through ticketmaster.com.
Game sites: This season, sites include the main SLYSA complex in St. Charles, Sportport in Maryland Heights, the Kolping Kicks complex in St. Louis, the Lou Fusz complex in Maryland Heights and Gametime Sports in St. Peters. Those sites can be configured to create dozens of fields of all different sizes, and they include several artificial turf fields. Other sites, such as in Illinois and at local high schools and universities, also are available as needed.
"I see so many ugly, ugly rain gardens going in -- especially in developments," she said. "Developers have to do it, so they throw in some seeds and don't maintain the gardens. It gives rain gardens a bad name. I'm out to prove they can look decent."
Newman is still trying to figure out which techniques for drying will be most practical and result in a high-quality product. She has just a few dozen packets available currently but hopes to be able to harvest more in the spring, when the bushes flush vigorously. Tea bushes may never blanket her local hills like wine grapevines, but she does see promise selling to customers who want to know the farmer who produces their tea.
Terrence Bichsel: $1,346,660
Lawson was obviously familiar to Hilde; she saw him at Briggs Camp on the morning of that fateful day. Whatever doubts she might have had that she also saw him that night were eventually swept away, Lawson's attorneys maintain, by the lobbying of sheriff's detectives.
Anastasio adds that the six-member band also will include Cliff Almond, a San Diego drum virtuoso, and bassist Mark Vanderpoel, "who lives in New York but grew up here." (Vanderpoel has "agreed to come live with his parents and surf during the day and play in the pit at night," Anastasio says.)
If the Gladiators are to beat Pittsburgh, they likely need to stop giving up so many big plays. Jacksonville quarterback Omar Jacobs threw six touchdown passes against them -- all of at least 18 yards, five of 25-plus.
City officials didn't monitor the books closely enough to notice that huge amounts of tax dollars were disappearing, according to the charges.
Zamora, however, said that if Ramos had been outraged by the shooting, he hadn't rushed out to avenge his friend.
"Numerically, this is significant because Burger King is such a big purchaser of these products," he said.
The FBI and the IRS Criminal Investigation division jointly investigated the case, authorities said.
Edwards assured Young that he had consulted campaign finance lawyers and the transactions were legal.
Change of pace: Justin Masterson said he's ready to start the season opener April 5 against Toronto after going six innings Monday against Milwaukee in a 6-5 loss. Masterson threw 98 pitches, while allowing five runs on seven hits.
The top 15 golfers not on either of the top two teams advance to the sectional meet. Those golfers (actually 19 of them because of a five-way tie for 15th place) were: Crancer; Dillon Eaton of Lafayette with 76; Seth Smith of Ladue and Blake Smith of Eureka with 78; Brett Darland of Parkway South and Kevin Groppe of CBC with 79; Michael Meyer of CBC, Matt Miklas of Eureka, Kyle Glennon of Lafayette and Jack Darland of Parkway South with 80; Sam Mauer of Eureka, Dan Papineau of Kirkwood and Michael Kehoe of CBC with 81; Austin Guffey of Parkway South with 82; and David Arth of Parkway South, Matthew Mueller of Vianney, Nick Barks of CBC, Samuel Crowder of Ladue and Justin Dwyer of Parkway South with 85.
"They played for the first time in prime time," Richard said. "Then we got a call the commercial played during a Laker game."
Can all this civility last? That's to be seen, but "Sen. Brown plans on sitting on the Republican side next year," says Meghan Dubyak, spokeswoman for the Democrat.
She was suspended prior to USC's last regular season game against Washington for two games, and USC coach Michael Cooper confirmed on Tuesday that Corral will not play in USC's Wednesday game against Washington State in the opening round of the Pac-10 tournament.
OK.
Founded: 1992.
An incredulous Nielsen took Reid's business card, but it would be months before she took up his offer.
Gingrich gave vague mention to a campaign reassessment Tuesday night in Concord, N.C. – he was in the Tar Heel state trying to drum up support for the May 8 primary – and by Wednesday morning had made up his mind.
He said these types of false fortresses will always fall, and in order to build a fortress with God you need to talk to him.
This is how Brent Williams — not using the nickname that would define him or the $400-a-week job that would save him — spent three days at the 1994 Final Four.
When it comes to austerity, investors are a fickle bunch. Too much austerity and they worry the cure will kill the patient; too little and they fret governments have abandoned fiscal discipline. Recent weeks have seen both concerns arise simultaneously.
not shoo-in for Liz Taylor role
Typing was all but compulsory for any woman who wanted a job, said Geeta Meshran, 53, who banged away for 22 years in the Mumbai government's typing pool. Efficiency wasn't always paramount there. "I often worked as slowly as possible, so I wouldn't have to retype the page," she said.
"A lot of people say they are going to do stuff and get people involved from the community, but they never do," he said.
Companies such as More Than Gourmet make super-concentrated stocks and demi-glace (as well as fish and chicken stocks). Look for them near other bouillon bases and soups at your market. The product itself is reduced to a thick paste, which can be added directly to a sauce to give it that restaurant-quality flavor and finish, or diluted into a more typical stock. If you can't find demi-glace, a variation using beef stock is noted at the end of the recipe.
Williams moved into the national lead with a clearance of 6 feet at last Friday's Del Oro Invitational.
Until Thursday, Hurd was the least polarizing of the three former Cowboys the Bears signed in late July. Williams has been criticized for dropped passes, most notably one on the goal line in the fourth quarter of the Bears' 10-3 loss to the Kansas City Chiefs two weeks ago. In that same game, former Cowboys running back Marion Barber negated an easy touchdown when he wasn't lined up on the line of scrimmage. Then, in a 13-10 loss to the Denver Broncos last Sunday, Barber failed to stay inbounds late in the fourth quarter, providing the Broncos an additional 30-plus seconds to move down the field and set up a game-tying field goal. He later lost a fumble in overtime.
California voters will get to decide yet again whether to impose a 48-hour waiting period and require parental notification when girls younger than age 18 seek abortions.
"I think it's more than that with the mileage I put on it," she said.
“As hard as it is, you are talking to people who have been where you are, and are doing it along with you,” Streck said. “There is something about that which gives you a release and helps you deal with it in a much better way.”
The Governor's Office on Thursday released the latest round of invoices from its outside legal counsel, Phoenix law firm Snell & Wilmer.
"We are taking the necessary steps this next year to evolve our total retail store strategy, and make it even easier for customers to shop with Best Buy and access our services. To achieve this, one of our first steps will be the closing of 50 U.S. Best Buy stores to fuel growth initiatives," Susan Busch, senior director of public relations for Best Buy, said in an email.
Even Gavin Newsom, the Democrat and former San Francisco mayor who is now California's lieutenant governor, is jumping on this bandwagon. Newsom joined Logue on the Texas trip and returned extolling the virtues of making his home state more friendly to business.
"How many incidents must we catalog before we take action to crack down on private ownership of dangerous exotic animals?’’ Reps. Howard "Buck" McKeon (R-Santa Clarita) and Loretta Sanchez (D-Garden Grove), sponsors of the Big Cats and Public Safety Protection Act, said in a letter to colleagues seeking their support.
The stencils come in large and small sizes, perfect for walls or smaller projects. When using them, you can go with the traditional stencil pouncing method and fabric paint, or you can try fabric spray paint.
"Self-defense? How could that be?" Copeland said. "My friend would have to have initiated some kind of physical threat - and that never happened. Someone was killed that night, and there was no punishment at all for it. If that punch wasn't thrown, we wouldn't be talking about this right now.''
øQ: What are you most worried about?
Batton said police are continuing to investigate the robbery.
James carried three times for 78 yards, which means he had more than one-third of the two teams’ combined 227 rushing yards in his cameo appearance.
Robinson's agent, Chase Callahan, said the 40 is always important for safeties.
MILK YOUR PEDIGREE
"Additionally," the statement continued, "we continue to adjust our business to align with market conditions and ensure that we remain positioned for growth."
"One district announced it is cutting 60 positions. That same district has cut 150 positions over the past four years," Hereford Percy, a former Jefferson County school board member told the crowd.
He’s worked in the kitchens of some of the biggest names in New York: David Bouley, Bill Telepan and Jean-Georges Vongerichten. And his restaurant, Fascino in Montclair, became a foodie favorite almost from the instant it opened in 2003, with its progressive Italian food made with a bit of French flair.
Think about that.
The New York media company's earnings exceeded analysts' estimates, and revenue was largely within expectations. The company, controlled by billionaire Sumner Redstone, also spent about $700 million during the quarter to repurchase 14.7 million shares.
Hewlett-Packard shares fell 40 cents to $52.88, while Palm surged $1.21, or 26 percent, to $5.84.
OREGON CITY -- Police have closed their investigation into a complaint filed by a Coos Bay police captain, criticizing the way Oregon City officers responded to a drunken fight at the Best Western Rivershore Hotel on Aug. 15.
1. Indianapolis Andrew Luck, QB, Stanford.
A 23-year-old Antioch man faces felony charges for vandalizing a police car and carrying a backpack full of incendiaries during an evening outbreak of violence during Tuesday's May Day demonstrations in downtown Oakland.
His favorite thing in the store? An orange Mundo Cargo Bicycle, with an enormous platform on back to hold groceries, children, suitcases, surf boards or a date - up to 500 pounds. The "pickup truck" of bikes, the $1,150 conveyance is a customizable, ecological Sausalito invention.
The outcome fell sharply short of average forecasts for a
What’s inside: Marvelous British voices — Hugh Laurie, Jim Broadbent, Bill Nighy — and animation from the Aardman folks make this extra merry.
It's rare to witness the entirety of a murder. But that's how some local scientists investigated exactly what happened during a fatal attack in 2010.
The Dodgers' new owners will collect parking fees, but they have not said how that revenue might be split with McCourt, or what development they might have envisioned for the parking lots.
Officer Ricardo Alvarado, a spokesman for the Maricopa Police Department, said the Maricopa Meadows and Alterra South housing subdivisions in southwest Maricopa had received three reports of indecent exposure over the last week.
But his moments with Chan, which are a big hunk of the movie, are mostly awkward; put a gun in his hand and Statham can play the protector. But paternal seems beyond his reach.
Other first-place winners are: Dave D’Alessandro (sports column), Jason Grant (Robert P. Kelly Award), Joe Lee (news page design portfolio), Neville Harvey (feature section page design portfolio), Caryn Shinske, Erin O’Neill and Bill Wichert (innovation) and Andy Mills (spot news, photo).
Several studies have shown that navigation services increase participation in cancer screening and adherence to follow-up care. Data from a five-year study, sponsored by the National Cancer Institute and involving thousands of patients, are being analyzed to determine the benefits of patient navigation to groups including racial and ethnic minorities, who often don't get early screening and face multiple barriers to timely and effective care.
A second daughter is in critcal condition at MetroHealth Medical Center, after being injured in the attack.
The 1895 artwork — a modern symbol of human anxiety, the image of a man holding his head and screaming under a streaked, blood-red sky — is one of four versions by the Norwegian expressionist painter. The auctioned piece at Sotheby's is the only one left in private hands.
Carrion said he admires Obama for inspiring unity.
Robert Schwartzmann’s combo has always been a cut above the average power-pop band, capable of crafting memorable choruses but too stylized and self-conscious for mainstream radio. The first album introduced Rooney as likable cads with a sunny sound; the second revealed a band restrained, chomping at the bit to experiment. Sprung from its major-label contract, Rooney has ditched its commercial ambitions, hit the crates of ’70s soft-rock records for inspiration and honed its craftsmanship. Schwartzmann is clearly a Donald Fagen fan, but he lacks Fagen’s chord vocabulary, so much of “Eureka” sounds like Billy Joel’s interpretation of Steely Dan on “52nd Street.” But that’s still pretty good, and on one song, “The Hunch,” Rooney stumbles into the vein of glittering AM gold that has heretofore eluded them.
The Holland parks department estimated Monday that about 40 percent of the 500,000 flowers planted by the city will be in bloom next week.
Letter writers to The Times know exactly what they think on that score and emailed their comments on the week's Supreme Court oral arguments in no uncertain terms:
But the battle was not over.
Another improbable run showed the Giants are among the league’s elite. But plenty of personnel decisions will need to be made. Does GM Jerry Reese re-sign DE Dave Tollefson? What about CBs Aaron Ross and Terrell Thomas, who missed the season with a torn ACL? Does oft-disgruntled DE Osi Umenyiora get traded a la Jeremy Shockey after Super Bowl XLII? Decisions, decisions.
"In my mind he was a mid- to late- first-round prospect with a lot of upside, but when you start to look at it and you take your initial bias out of it, he has everything you look for,'' said McShay. "It took taking a step back and looking at everything I had down on paper on this guy to realize he belongs in the top 10 and he has a chance to be an elite quarterback in the NFL. I think he belongs in the top 10 and I'd have no problem pulling the trigger on this guy.''
The monsoon exit means it will be almost cool in the mornings, the perfect time to get out into the garden after spending the summer peering at heat waves emanating off the sidewalks.
Saturday: Partly cloudy with a slight chance of showers and storms. High 78.
PROPERTY DAMAGE: A vehicle was reported damaged at 10:35 a.m. Feb. 26 in the 1300 block of Hawkins Road.
BLUES vs. Colorado
What the site has generated is an unexpected amount of social behavior. This is particularly ironic for Mr. McGrath, who says he built crude social-networking functions into Wordie as a way to parody online dating sites.
Many of Hobson’s crew were trapped below decks, their escape cut off by the ship’s severed underbelly, rushing waters and the panic of many men who had never been at sea. As the sailors fought the freezing torrents, desperately searching for a way out — screeching sounds of twisted metal around them — their darkest fear quickly became reality:
Conroy entered the Society of Jesus in 1973 and was ordained a priest in 1983. He has also served as a chaplain at Georgetown University.
The camera shoots 720P video instead of 1080P (no big loss, on a camera that doesn't take exceptional photos) and its front-facing chat cam is a decent 1 MP.
But in a setback for travel agents, the government declined at least temporarily to force airlines to clearly disclose all fees in their electronic connections with agents.
"There's a certain sense of direction, but we have a pretty wide path," Tom says. "It just starts to fall together."
The rejected contract would have offered workers pay increases for each of the next four years, a $2,000 signing bonus and improvements to health care and retirement plans for entry level workers.
2 14-ounce cans hearts of palm, drained, rinsed, and patted dry
Patti Blagojevich closed her eyes tight, tears still rolling down her face, when Goldstein played a tape recording of a giddy Blagojevich calling his youngest daughter and putting on a high baby-like voice, saying -- "Hey Annie!"
"That lack of certainty has now changed," Kitzhaber wrote.
That's all built on an ''if." However, even the basics suggest you'll have no Thanksgiving peace until you resolve whether you owe your mom a visit.
Earl Cherniak, Black's Toronto-based lawyer, said Black just wants to rest.
TRENTON — Uncle Sam will have to wait a little longer for the bill New Jersey was charged for reneging on the plan to build the ARC commuter train tunnel under the Hudson River.
Is this just another way for hotels to make money? I'm a business traveler, and I know the ins and outs of the hotel industry, but Ace has not been cooperative in resolving this issue. Any help you can provide to shed some light on this ridiculous charging practice would be much appreciated. -- Bernardino Suva, Los Angeles
Jones first joined Burton on his lush 2011 album, "Rome," an imaginary soundtrack teamed with composer Daniele Luppi steeped in the Ennio Morricone-scored spaghetti westerns of the '60s and '70s. Though Burton was said to be in the studio and unavailable for interviews, he's previously described Jones as his first choice for the icily detached female vocal counterpoint to that record's other high-profile guest, Jack White.
From the get-go, everything feels familiar, from the over-reliance on drugs and profanity as an easy way to score laughs to the Jersey Shore setting.
Another common bird at Kokee is the Kauai amakihi, with its black mask and medium-length, sickle-shaped bill. A generalist, the amakihi feeds on nectar, fruits and insects gleaned from bark or leaves. Its trilling song — chi, chi, chi, chi — sometimes drops in pitch.
The ensuing upthrust and volcanism created nearby Mount Fuji.
After a lethargic recent practice by the Bears, Mulkey asked her team to stand in separate groups, divided by players who had won a championship at any level and those who should be very hungry to complete this mission at the Final Four.
And I know that even questioning the veracity of an accuser in these politically correct times can be misinterpreted as defending the accused. Not true. But forgive me if I approach this Greg Kelly story with healthy skepticism, with the burden of proof in the accuser's corner, especially since she waited three months to file a report and seems to have been in repeated contact with Kelly since the night they met.
* He said there's a chance linebacker Titus Brown (ankle) can still contribute. "He's done a good job in terms of competing and doing what he has to do to make the team. We're anticipating there's a chance he could be back soon.''
Then travels to the Pollock-Krasner House and Study Center.
Wilkinson was the first witness called in the second day of a student transfer case that could have broad implications for those in unaccredited districts in Missouri.
Melanie Taylor's ex-husband was driving her to tears with his repeated calls, text messages and emails. She went to court hoping to file a restraining order against him, she said, but was told she didn't meet the requirements.
There will be 10 best-picture nominees -- five each in the Dramatic category and the Musical or Comedy category. We're still reeling from two of the biggest WTF moments in recent Golden Globe nominations history where the Coen brother Western "True Grit" didn't make the cut this year in the Best Motion Picture - Drama category (despite landing on both the AFI and several Critics' Choice Awards' lists of the top 10 films of the year).
Makes 2-2 1/2 cups
The lines meet at Willamette Stone State Heritage Site off Northwest Skyline Boulevard near Barnes Road. Their intersection defines the grid system of sections and townships for all real property surveyed in Oregon and Washington.
Pigs are breeding machines, gestating for four months and giving birth to 10 or so piglets, and they eat just about anything. Humans who "eat like pigs"? If only.
"I don’t know anything else to do," she said. "I’m going to put out resumes and other things."
OUTBOUND: From the central business district, proceed north on Gay, which becomes Ensor and then Harford Road. Turn right onto Biddle Street. Just beyond Broadway, bear left onto Gay. Follow Gay, which becomes Belair Road, and proceed to the Beltway.
The 17-year-old boy was in the back of a house around 4 p.m. in the 700 block of East Sibley Road when the truck plowed through the kitchen at the front of the home, causing major damage, Dolton Fire Department Chief Jerry McCullough said.
"Oh," responded Grant as he sheepishly slinked away from their final farewell to a loved one.
The group met for the first time five months ago and began to discuss their long-term plans for Forest Park.
While California’s treasurer has gone as far as to call the firm "crooks," Boyce’s office said the Ohio pension funds’ assets will be safe. In addition, Boyce’s office has estimated the contracts with the bank, which were competitively bid, will save the Ohio pension funds $7.3 million.
The U.S. Department of Justice approved the controversial map that ensured incumbents weren't pulled out of their districts.
A Florida judge Friday set a $150,000 bond for George Zimmerman, the neighborhood watch volunteer who shot an unarmed black teenager and touched off a firestorm of controversy about race and the American justice system.
Anything less than a win and three points would be a major disappointment and render a crippling blow to their playoff aspirations.
Democrats also must seize the opportunity to remove an inadequate Juvenile Court judge, Alison Nelson Floyd. It must be done now, because the Republicans have not fielded a candidate for the office.
This program will be held from July 23 to 27, 9 a.m. to 4 p.m. at the Somerset County Emergency Services Training Academy, 402 Roycefield Road Hillsborough.
"First, become clear what your duty or purpose is in life. Second, learn to love it."
I respect the beliefs of others, and the right of religious institutions to act in accordance with their own doctrines. But I believe that in the eyes of the law, all Americans should be treated equally. And where states enact same-sex marriage, no federal act should invalidate them.
Originally service in the Reading Corps and Math Corps was restricted to a maximum of two years, but that's now been extended to up to four years as part of a federal effort to encourage more participation in public service. Members commit to either 1,720 or 920 hours per year, and on successful completion of their service, they receive higher education grants of up $5,550 a year for full-time members. The number of members returning to serve a second or third year is increasing, but the goal is to have 900 members next year -- the largest recruitment drive yet -- so more applicants are needed (go to www.MinnesotaReadingCorps. org or www.MinnesotaMathCorps. org for more information).
Hirsch has suggested Suleman could work as a Vivid representative at parties, and that her work could help cover her monthly costs.
The firm told the retailer that it wanted to take a closer look at "serious deterioration in the Pep Boys business." Pep Boys — which is based in Philadelphia but has 130 shops in California, the most in any state — said Tuesday that it would post disappointing first-quarter results.
“We’re not in this to please everyone,” he said. “Hopefully, we please enough people that the tax gets voted in.”
"My wife and I have a friend in Portland who thinks we should move to Portland," says Abumrad. "Portland exists for us as a fantasy."
Does this mean the Yankees will struggle to make the playoffs?
That was the first fish I ever caught big enough to eat, and I wish now I had a picture of it.
At the event, held at Laguna Hills High School, women competed in six weight classes, from 115 pounds to 165 pounds. Participants came from more than 60 gyms across California. The largest previous tournament for women was a Texas tournament in 2010. Seventy-seven women competed there.
"She had always been strictly committed to her students. That was always very clear, and she enjoyed teaching at historically black institutions," Ms. Clifton, who lives in Woodland Hills, Calif., said in a telephone interview.
The Cardinals backed Lynn with another display of offense that included three hits from three different hitters. Rafael Furcal had his third three-hit game of the season, giving him as many hits (10) in 19 at-bats this season as he had in a frustrating 52 at-bats during spring training. Carlos Beltran moved into the cleanup spot and contributed three hits, including his second homer of the season.
The mechanisms still aren't entirely clear, adds Murray, who was one of the first researchers to identify the effect. Perhaps thinking your partner is the absolute shizzle makes you more likely to be committed and more constructive in dealing with him or her. Or it could be the other way around. "We've found that being idealized by your partner changes the way you feel about yourself," Murray says. In this way, positive illusions might be a self-fulfilling prophecy: We unconsciously live up to our partner's rosy view of us.
For more than a month they put together the art piece, using chicken wire, plastic grocery bags, ribbons of fabric, an old paint can and other items that would otherwise have been sitting in a landfill. While they were creating, Crain taught lessons on sustainability.
Corner kicks: Fossil Ridge 1-0 — 1; Fort Collins 2-1 — 3.
The budget now stands at $5 million more than FitzGerald's proposal. But that's $8 million less than spending this year and $13 million less than last year.
The breakdown: Is he a legit NFL QB? No. But he’s one of those rare athletes that can control a game with talent and sheer will.
"Sometimes we can run them out of gas a little bit," Coleman said. "I can throw more bodies at them and that is huge."
1430, Joseph S. Clark, Merchantville, 3:01:43.
Perry then told the lawyers that she would likely be able to find another judge and re-schedule the hearing for Tuesday morning.
Wilkinson ordered the attorneys to try to work out an agreement on their own. They did, and the loser was me. Normandin will get the special file but the judge ordered him not to show it to any third party. He set an initial contempt hearing for Dec. 19. Brown won't be required to attend - yet.
WALLEYE WITH ALMONDS AND MEYER LEMONS
For the sitcom "Mike & Molly" on CBS, she packs her sets with details: "Mike's mom's house was a delight to do. I found a fabulous blue recliner with a drink holder where she spends a lot of time. She's surrounded by nail polish and various medications. Her house reflects that she reads a lot, mostly romance novels. She's Irish-Catholic, so there are statues that reflect that. When the set first appeared, people came up to me and said it reminded them of their Aunt Sally in Wisconsin, and I was so pleased."
"My friend just texted me and said, `I feel like death,'" Byrd said, before responding with a solution: "We're on the hangover helper bus."
So how has the finch forecast turned out? In a word: Wrong!
The April 5 piece noted that Ron Ryan, former commander of the Metro Gang Strike Force, had approved sending at least five of the six attendees, and that Omodt, the current commander, learned about the $16,800 tab shortly after taking over the force in January.
Sorrento Springs - Catherine Pecher
Mana Food Bar
A ballet-inspired "barre" workout has been sweeping the nation.
A nearby bungalow that Frank Sinatra used when he worked on the lot is on the Los Angeles side of the boundary. It is out of West Hollywood's jurisdiction, although the six-room structure is listed by DeGrazia as scheduled for demolition.
"History teaches," Reagan told the nation, "that wars begin when governments believe the price of aggression is cheap." He convinced the nation it was time to rebuild.
Changi also has a private terminal called "Jet Quay" that is used by celebrities, private jet-setters, government officials, CIPs—Commercially Important Persons—and anyone else willing to pay. For about $1,150, you get jet-side limo service. For $231 you get the use of a private terminal along with golf-cart rides to gates. For $62, Jet Quay personnel will greet you at arrival and escort you through main terminal areas.
“That bond was forged right from the beginning,’’ Ramsay said. “Maurice was very good for Bill. Bill was not a physical-type player, even though he was highly skilled. We needed someone like Luke, and you know, he ended up being there for everybody.’’
According to Patterson, some 30,000 Hessians fought during the war, with 7,500 captured — including Lowe’s great-grandfather, who fought in a regiment with Col. Johann Rall.
Aside from a bout of kennel cough, 7-year-old Susie greeted a visitor Wednesday with a bark and wag of the tail, which wagged faster the more her head was rubbed.
"Shell has waited years to recover its investment," Sullivan told a three-judge panel of the 9th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in Portland. "We're ready to go."
The enormous emotions in play were not only because of the prominence of Green-Beckham and the symbolic value of signing the
(10) Widefield (15-7) vs. (7) Erie (14-7), 12:15 p.m.
She set a positive tone Friday, as her piano quartet, Opus One, offered dynamic interpretations of Mozart's Piano Quartet No. 1 in G minor and No. 2 in E-flat.
If you think after decades of "ER," "House," "Scrubs" and "Grey's Anatomy" that young doctors coming of age and falling in love or in lust is a genre that has no surprises left in it, you're right. And "The Heart Specialist," a film written and directed by a physician with dreams of Hollywood glory, proves it.
Shanley took a pay cut from his previous job as managing director for the Portland arm of global real-estate firm Cushman & Wakefield to take the helm of SMART nearly three years ago.
Now the bad news: There are very limited hours, only noon to 1:30 p.m. during the weekdays. And it can be sardine-land, with lots of testosterone in company workouts. And the place is tricky to find, tucked away in a neighborhood.
"We're the adult choice," said Dan Fellman, head of distribution for Warner. "We feel we have really good play time ahead of us going into the holiday."
As the estimable James Mayer goes on the hunt in the wilds of East County, The Oregonian in its wisdom has expanded my "hyperlocal" portfolio, of downtown Portland, to the omniverse of Southwest Portland.
52. July-August 2003: Bruce and the E Street Band play 10 nights at Giants Stadium. I was at nine of them, all very good shows.
Crisp clean white's a common counterpoint, but you'll see black as a foil as well.
The winning student will get artwork on the website for a day, a $30,000 scholarship and a $50,000 technology grant for the child's school.
Do you call restaurants beforehand and tell them we’re coming?
46. New Jersey 20.3
But according to the Times, top Wal-Mart executives kept quiet about the campaign and were more focused on damage control than on exposing the corruption. Then-CEO H. Lee Scott Jr. reportedly rebuked internal investigators at one meeting for being overly aggressive. Shortly thereafter, the newspaper said, the investigation was turned over to the general counsel for Wal-Mart de Mexico, who himself was alleged to have authorized bribes. He swiftly exonerated his fellow executives.
Gilliland started out in the industry by founding Wild Oats Markets in Boulder during 1987. The company proceeded to grow into one of the nations largest health food chains. Gilliland left Wild Oats in 1999 and later started Sunflower Farmers Market, which has three locations in the Phoenix area.
"There are two contradicting feelings. Part of me says that a contending team wants me, and that’s gratifying,” Uehara said. “At the same time, Baltimore — I’ve been there for two years. It’s really sad.”
A few hundred laborers packed the basement of a Teamsters union hall, a day after about 5,500 union supporters descended on the Statehouse to oppose the bill, which is supported by Republican Gov. John Kasich.
Environmental critics and the National Park Service, which has a big stake in reducing haze, also say the utility overestimated the costs of more stringent pollution controls. Corson, the PGE spokesman, said the company consulted industry analysts and utility regulators on costs and is confident the numbers are reasonable.
Hayes said it was experiences like these that led her to now self-publish a 42-page paperback, "How Winning the Lottery Changed My Life." It's available at bookstores and online and retails for $11.96.
The proposal submitted by City Center, which had teamed up with the Oregon Association of Minority Entrepreneurs, called for a 5 percent to 9 percent cut of new revenue above $400,000.
(05-11) 10:20 PDT WASHINGTON, (AP) --
On her iPod: "Starships" by Nicki Minaj. "Invincible" by MGK.
They'll talk about the big plays, highlight the top performances, update all the scores from around the NFL and, as always, take your calls, chat room comments and emails.
"He's doing a real good job in the cage," Livingston said of Goodwin. "He's got one shutout on the season. He has got a 60-percent save percentage. You shoot for the 50s, so he's on track."
Beginning Jan. 1, all Northeast Ohio Clinic facilities will stop routinely accepting uninsured patients who can't pay, aren't eligible for government assistance and who live more than 150 miles or so from Cleveland.
4: Kansas City 30.5
The inauguration of the 44th president has sparked a flurry of logistical planning by the Presidential Inaugural Committee, the Joint Congressional Committee on Inaugural Ceremonies, the Armed Forces Inaugural Committee and the District of Columbia, not to mention restaurants, hotels, tuxedo and limousine rentals, and other enterprises.
Conour focuses his law practice on construction-liability cases involving serious injury and death, according to court documents.
In 2008, believing that federal investigators were after him, Dimora began calling Melaragno and contractors, seeking invoices for the work at his home so he could make payments, the charges state.
Revenue rose 27 percent to $10.8 billion, just under analysts' forecasts of $10.9 billion. The company had projected revenue between $10.7 billion and $10.9 billion. Revenue in the quarter last year was $8.5 billion.
Waters also admitted to researching on the Internet how to make guns and other weapons. The St. Charles County Cyber Crimes Unit retrieved images of weapons on Waters' computer as well as video clips about how to build and shoot guns.
And assistant coach Steve Clifford has worked closely with Anderson.
The Spurs were the ones with the big lead this time after closing the first half on a 26-8 run amid a flurry of Lakers turnovers.
This makes it easier for people who are fishing to deplete resources, Coulson said, sitting at a table Sunday afternoon surrounded by dozens of vendors at the 8th annual Larimer County Fishing Expo at The Ranch, put on by the county's department of Natural Resources.
"I think taxes are too high and I think the whole state is overregulated and I think it's partly contributing to driving away businesses," said Haboustak, a retired metallurgical engineer. "I think we're due for a change. I don't appreciate Ted Strickland's policies."
Christie went a step further in his conditional veto by seeking the repeal of the early release program, which became law more than a year ago.
O'Neill called it a good asset and said since the city already has spent the money to make the camp available to families, it should be used. Khamis, however, said he doesn't believe in funding projects that can't sustain themselves.
2) How does offensive coordinator Bruce Barnum recalibrate the pistol offense to take into account his deepest group of running backs and a more pass-first quarterback?
About 40 supporters of the bill were sequestered on the Capitol grounds by a cadre of yellow-shirted security guards who linked arms around them for protection.
The Sea Turtle Restoration Project's long list of victories and challenges are an inspired read. Visit http://www.seaturtles.org/
When the trial began in late February, prosecutors said the shootings began over a missing piece of costume jewelry.
Parker spoke in that February interview while sitting in a huge warehouse near the Manhattan Bridge. A few of the Flyknit prototype running shoes sat nearby.
Cleanliness: Scuffed and worn, but clean.
Why, after more than a decade of tax-exempt status for Golden Rain Foundation, did the IRS change its mind?
Braun hit a solo homer deep into the sandy play area beyond the right-center fence - one of the deepest parts of the park - with one out in the fourth. That homer was in the area where the Padres are considering bringing in the fences.
• Bruce Constantineau, Vancouver Sun: Highlight-reel Hassli eager to regain scoring magic: "Hassli, with 10 MLS goals this season, and Camilo, with nine, account for two-thirds of the Whitecaps' 29 goals this year, so when one them gets mired in a scoring slump, it's a big deal for the struggling first-year expansion club."
Lauding Bowne for his council and mayoral service during what he called “a critical time of transition in the city’s history,” Ovrom said there was no better model for a council member than Bowne. “He was always interested in things that brought people together rather than what tore them apart,” said Ovrom. “He served with the highest level of professionalism and civility.”
Instead, the Buckeyes are celebrating what should be their first Rose Bowl appearance in 11 years. OSU fan Lynne Crawford of Columbus brought a bouquet of a dozen roses, and Cleveland's Lynne Hinze passed them to players after the win. Wells, linebacker James Laurinaitis and corners Jenkins and Donald Washington, among others, held flowers in their teeth like Michigan's Charles Woodson famously posed a decade ago. But OSU is not completely out of the national title picture.
Chairman David Samson said the hike was unavoidable due to the drop in revenues suffered by the agency amid the lagging economy.
The connection is even closer. Studies show that approximately 40 percent of all diabetic men also have obstructive sleep apnea. Want more common ground? Many of these men with both conditions don't know that they have it. According to the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, nearly one-third of all Americans with diabetes haven't been diagnosed yet.
Key groups helping form Multnomah County's version include county government, the city of Portland, the United Way of the Columbia-Willamette, the school districts and the Leaders Roundtable, a coalition of local leaders in business, politics and education.
Politically explosive decisions must be made about which neighborhoods should be bulldozed and which improved. Hundreds of millions of federal dollars will be needed to buy land, raze buildings and relocate residents, since this financially desperate city does not have the means to do it on its own. It isn't known how many people in the mostly black, blue-collar city might be uprooted, but it could be thousands. Some won't go willingly.
The benefit came together in about a week with the help of people who know Hollingsworth and others who just want to help someone in need, she said.
Grant said he’ll party it up today at the parade and the celebration that will follow at MetLife Stadium. Sunday night and today were more about the simpler moments, such as when his 11-year old daughter, De’yon Imari, embraced him on the field.
"Houston ... is a market where we could turn to and show how deeply the sport has been embedded," he said. "We can turn to Houston and use it as a shining example. What has been missing up until now is a soccer-specific stadium."
Most people are lucky if they can change the world in one important way, but Mr. Jobs, in multiple stages of his business career, changed global technology and media in multiple ways on multiple occasions. And that changed the way people live.
"I'll create at least 2 1/2 million new jobs, and I know something about that," Perry says in the ad that highlights Texas job creation.
Whether you like snack shack duty or not, you learn a few things about contemporary society when you spend time in what is essentially a trailer the size of a backyard shed. Inside, shelves are filled with candy and coolers are crowded with iced bottles of waters and sports drinks. On the counter are instructions that have been laminated against soda spills and the sticky syrup that flavors slushies.
The NFL Jacksonville Jaguars, according to various reports, had asked permission to talk with OBrien about their head coaching job, which opened up last month when Jack Del Rio was fired.
No students were in the area where the fire started because it was lunchtime. Many students were eating or already outside, Davalos said.
White Nationalists
Superintendent of Schools John Fauta said the classroom was emptied of students sometime last week after the cleaning staff spotted a bedbug.
One California official called such intentional spikings "a wrong-headed approach to safety," and the federal board said it was possible that the increases "progressively weakened" Line 132 before the blast. PG&E abandoned the practice after the San Bruno disaster, although the company insisted it had been safe.
It's the time of year to put on your favorite hat and walking shoes, grab a chair and go shop and hang out at an open-air farmers market.
"They can investigate all they want but they won’t find one scintilla of evidence to support an upgrade in the charges," said Steve Altman, Ravi’s attorney.
But Baylor couldn't generate any offense, and Mizzou 10 straight free throws – including four by Phil Pressey – and 11 of its last 12 to put it away. Also helping put away the Bears was Steve Moore's dunk with just under a minute left.
Like many, Lisen Stromberg won’t remember her neighbor for the MacBook Air she writes on or the iPhone she talks on. She’ll think back to that Halloween night when she and her son walked by Jobs dressed as Frankenstein and he smiled and said, “Hi, Lisen.”
Heavy winds helped the fire spread to three other buildings and at least six families were driven from their homes, the report said.
Declaring that unchecked illegal immigration is undermining the entire legal system, Gov. Tim Pawlenty proposed a sweeping array of state responses on Tuesday, including a Minnesota enforcement team, more screening by local authorities, and increased penalties for false identification, human trafficking and hiring of illegal immigrants.
But we saw another side of the sanguine Steinberg this week as he worked to persuade two Democratic holdouts on the budget to vote in favor of its passage.
Those who remember the old Kwong Shing Market in San Francisco's Richmond District will be happy to know that its fried chicken lives on.
"We fully expect Occupy St. Louis to be a prominent, visible presence in our community indefinitely," said Eddie Roth, an aide to Slay. "We're just asking them to follow the law, and we'll accommodate them in every way we can."
Still, as the Associated Press points out, the Thunder's 14-2 mark in March is the best record for a month in "franchise history." This is one of those things that drives Sonics loyalists batty -- the notion that the Thunder can break franchise records set for Seattle, essential wiping Soncis' history off the books.
Here’s a clue: This sacred space can be found at a busy intersection in the western part of the largest suburb served by this newspaper. Directly across the street is another religious building. If you know what and where it is, send your answer to editor Carol Kovach at ckovach@sunnews.com or Go Seek, c/o Sun Post-Herald, 5510 Cloverleaf Parkway, Cleveland 44125.
At Poinciana, Principal Belynda Pinkston said the grant means her teachers have time to work on lessons together and to learn to be better teachers.
Vann, in addition to overseeing a 5,000-member megachurch, founded the Vanguard Community Development Corp., which under Davis'leadership is building homes and offering education programs in the blighted North End.
But he also chose to tell — concurrently — the woman’s story from the end to the beginning.
"On a year-round basis, the smell is not going to be controllable," she said. "In the end, they are going to destroy property values and harm existing businesses."
Cities, counties and fire districts don't go from frugal to foie gras overnight. It happens over time. One closed meeting begets another, and, before you know it, decisions about hundreds of thousands of dollars are being made behind closed doors.
Britain has not fielded a soccer team for the Summer Games since 1960 because Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland feared losing their independence with FIFA if they joined England to produce an Olympic team. But soccer's world governing body assured federations that their status won't be affected by participating in the 16-nation Olympic event this summer.
4 percent; $219 for a home assessed at $306,343
But along with the gains there also have been losses. The group has suffered significant setbacks as the CIA and the U.S. military focus more on Yemen. On Sunday, Fahd al-Quso, a senior al Qaeda leader, was hit by a missile as he stepped out of his vehicle along with another operative in the southern Shabwa province of Yemen.
There needs to be a funeral.
College: Westminster (criminal justice)
‘‘I was channeling my inner John Lucas,'' he cracked.
For one hour, Brian listened intently to his father’s voice.
The biggest gap came on the 2008 Pepper Bridge Walla Walla Valley Cabernet Sauvignon, Washington, which we recommended last week. Its tested alcohol of 15.17 percent was far above the 14.1 percent on the label.
Hesson was the first of the suspects to be arrested on a charge of felonious assault. He was released on bond Tuesday. There was no phone listing for him in the Cincinnati area. His court-appointed attorney, David Donnett, has declined to discuss what Hesson has said about the allegations, citing attorney-client privilege.
The 2nd U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in Manhattan decided the case after hearing lawyers several months ago debate whether the 1998 Digital Millennium Copyright Act shields a company like YouTube from broad copyright claims. Google Inc. paid $1.76 billion for YouTube in 2006, just months after the video service was launched in December 2005.
Trustee Sarah Roffi pointed out that the district has six other buildings that students must be bused to safely, as well as on field trips and sporting events.
Draizin spends his free time tinkering with a reverse osmosis machine that will turn any liquid, including whiskey from House Spirits distillery, into an ice cream, without losing any flavor.
This was the closest governor's race in Oregon since 1956, when Democrat Robert Holmes beat Republican Elmo Smith by 8,599 votes, or just over 1 percent. And it followed the pattern of several close statewide races in recent years: the Republican leads on election night only to see it whittled away as populous Multnomah County struggles to count its massive haul of ballots.
The rules of goal-oriented dating and romantic comedy are much the same. If no man proposes marriage from natural causes, then unnatural ones will be contrived. Story and collaborators succeed in making a courtship comedy that will entertain women and amuse men.
Aldermen make about $37,000 a year, not including benefits. Cutting 16 would, on its face, reduce spending by at least $600,000 annually.
Ron Spaeth, Lombard
Sen. John Marty, a DFLer from Roseville, still voted no. Thursday's yes vote, he said, "says something is tragically wrong about our priorities around here."
Babeu said his office received multiple reports of a plane crash and fire around 6:30 p.m.
How this series was prepared
always mean long prison terms.
"I was a little disappointed with the way we had played up until that point," Patterson said. "We certainly had not played our best. I got on them a little bit at halftime and told them that they had one half left to go out and win a state championship."
The grandparents of seven want to know if they can help their family financially.
Former CU quarterback Tyler Hansen tweeted Saturday night that he will sign a free-agent contract with the Bengals, and CU defensive tackle Conrad Obi tweeted that he will sign with the Cardinals.
Yet, Kingston said an independent investigation should be conducted to find out what safeguards are in place to ensure that both deputy district attorneys and jail guards know the law and are not secretly recording privileged conversations.
The trust fund that operates the school is worth $7 billion to $8 billion, while the school enrolls about 1,800 students.
Packy Malley, vice president of Malley's Chocolates and founder of One Love concert promotion: "I always start at A.J. Rocco's downtown for the St. Baldrick's benefit. Then off to see live Irish music all day. I start with the parade, then move on to visiting friends in the downtown hotel suites and the traditional party at the Cleveland Athletic Club. Then perhaps popping in on some of the great Irish bars along Lorain Road like Pride of Erin or P.J. McIntyre's."
Uunless this tradition is deeply important to you, you're better off with a different approach: Carve the breast across the grain. This gives you uniform, whole pieces even if the bird is a little more than perfectly done, and every bit of slightly overdone outer meat will be balanced by a moist piece of inside meat. Even better, it ensures that each slice carries a piece of skin.
All of those factors contributed to modest job growth.
Among the possible scenarios are:
Old evenings in Gion
He reappears with miniscule hamburgers, the size of a quarter. He baked mini buns and dusted each with three sesame seeds. He cut tiny rings of onion, mini pickles, mini tomatoes. Diminutive stacks of matchstick fries are bundled together with chives.
The Native American Youth and Family Center (NAYA) in Northeast Portland also has bloomed over the past decade and tackled problems that undermine health: homelessness, unemployment, lack of prenatal care and poor nutrition.
Rancocas Valley (12-0) 11 2 3 1 — 17
Shelters interested in placing a pet in the Paw Print adoption column or submitting news should call (973) 392-5950 or e-mail middlesex@starledger.com.
HEADLINE: Dog-tired, Ambrose moves on
Which actually ain’t a bad thing when you consider that unique is what it’s all about, and the horse race which it showcases always delivers what it promises:
The property was put on the market Wednesday by Katherine Chez-Malkin of Baird & Warner Real Estate.
Theories abound as to why Putin decided not to join other global leaders for a meeting outside Washington and to postpone a much-anticipated meeting with President Barack Obama.
Hundreds of airports offer small chapels for prayer, including Lambert International in St. Louis.
Of the debate over the expiring Bush tax cuts, Obama said, "I believe we ought to make the tax cuts for the middle class permanent. These families are the ones who saw their wages and incomes flatline over the last decade -- and they deserve a break. And because they are more likely to spend on basic necessities, this will strengthen the economy as a whole."
When the percentage of births to unmarried mothers is at 76.6 percent in Cleveland, it's understandable why someone raised here would think there's nothing unusual about having a child out of wedlock. I've had young people tell me the reason they dropped out and turned to hustling drugs is because they needed to make a living and they saw their peers doing it.
This is government irresponsibility on an epic scale. Every trillion-dollar deficit is like an assault on this nation's future health. For a key national leader to ignore the debt crisis because the issue is politically explosive shows that as cynical as Americans are about politics, they might not be cynical enough.
The bowlers were given plaques honoring their achievement.
The group planned an open greenspace with meandering, well-lit paths and benches. But between landscaping, features and irrigation, the plan could have cost as much as $400,000 -- a tough sell for a park that would only be around for a few years.
The other sort of pie is the central ingredient in several other events. Competitors will bake pies, eat pies and throw pies.
"The president could have decided to distance himself from God or not believed in him due what he was going through," said Linda Aguirre, the organization's president. "I thank God that he's chosen the most important decision of his life: to embrace our Lord."
The latest investigation follows a stream of civil litigation against 1-800-GET-THIN.
This isn't ground-breaking news. In fact, it's pretty common in the veterinary field. It's one of the reasons vets encourage their clients to spay their female dogs (the other being, of course, to limit the number of unwanted dogs in the world, many of whom sadly end up at shelters where they await uncertain fates).
Other airline shares dropped in morning trading. Continental Airlines Inc. lost 42 cents, or 2.3 percent, to $18.08, while United parent UAL Corp. fell 12 cents to $12.97 and US Airways Group Inc. slipped 16 cents, or 3 percent, to $5.22. JetBlue Airways Corp. shares lost 14 cents, or 2.5 percent, to $5.50.
■ Vanecko and a friend, Craig Denham, ran away after Koschman was punched in the face. It's unknown where and when police found them. Another friend ran, but was stopped.
Lawrence says he felt he was "a total failure" after the marriage ended. "I was an old-fashioned boy who believed marriage was for life, and the success of it was the responsibility of the husband. I had erectile dysfunction for months after from the guilt."
This wondrous place is perfectly integrated into the rugged desert landscape.
Saint-Sauveur-en-Puisaye is a stonily silent town of about 950 people, slightly north of Burgundy wine country. It has only a pizzeria and a bed-and-breakfast to accommodate visitors. Most come not for Colette but to see nearby Guédelon, where a re-creation of a medieval castle is being built by hand using 13th century techniques.
Most people would call it fainting, blacking out or passing out. But doctors call it "syncope"(SIN-co-pee). By definition, it's a brief loss of consciousness that resolves without medical treatment within minutes.
James Lovings, one of the four boycotting aldermen and the group's de facto spokesman, said the onus was on the prosecuting attorney's office for the way it handled similar cases in the past. Officers have told him charges were not being applied for in many cases because of previous denials.
Per-share earnings, excluding some costs, were 47 cents, less than the 50 cents estimated by analysts.
5016 S 37th St, $98,000
Per serving: 250 calories, 13 g protein, 32 g carbohydrate, 8 g fat (1 g saturated), 0 cholesterol, 53 mg sodium, 11 g fiber.
Appearing calm and measured as he read the 20-minute speech, Kim Jong Un covered a wide range of topics, from foreign policy to the economy. His speech, and a military parade that followed, capped the carefully choreographed festivities commemorating Kim Il Sung's birthday.
That was Jim Davis, the guy who's platform included … zzzzzz. Sorry, I dozed off there for a minute thinking about Davis's campaign. Nice guy. Uninspiring campaign.
LADERA RANCH – Hundreds of members and friends of CrossLine Church had a blast while enjoying a chili cook off, Hula Hoop contests, bounce houses, cotton candy and a barbecue at the Stoneybrooke campus in Ladera Ranch Saturday.
Summit's executive-appointed law director, the Ohio Supreme Court ruled, cannot represent the executive in court because that right belongs exclusively to the prosecutor. The executive also cannot hire its own outside attorney, the court said.
The video was taken from a private camera, he said, about 6 p.m. on March 8 at a gravel parking lot at Southeast Jenne Road at the Springwater Trail.
Des Moines police did not know about the previous arrest when Singleton was hired. Officials today would learn about such an arrest, even without a conviction, because of improved technology and access to public records, said Des Moines Police Sgt. Chris Scott, department spokesman.
The Concordia tragedy could not have come at a more inopportune time for the cruise industry, which is recovering from the 2008 economic bust. Before the accident, the cruise market was expected to grow 5.6% percent and carry 20.3 million passengers in 2012, according to a forecast from Cruise Market Watch.
GOPAC officials say they want to help Indiana Republicans get the seven House seats needed so Republicans still could conduct businesses if Democrats walk out, as they have in the past two sessions.
But maybe you want more Shakespeare? No problem. There are the mixed-up twins in "The Comedy of Errors" at the Repertory Theatre of St. Louis and the haunting romance of "The Winter's Tale" at Mustard Seed, the theater in residence at Fontbonne University. St. Louis Shakespeare (which is not the festival) won't perform Shakespeare this season, but it certainly goes for the classics with Mary Zimmerman's version of "The Arabian Nights" at Black Cat.
"Licensed to Ill" not only made stars of Yauch, Adam "Ad-Rock" Horovitz and Michael "Mike D" Diamond, but also upended the music industry's conventional wisdom that rap music was a genre confined to a black audience.
Coll earned about $20,000 a year less than male full professors in the business school and Thompson-Sard calculated she and other female associate professors earned about $15,000 less per year than their male counterparts in the education college. Alexander and Coll requested and were denied salary adjustments, according to the decision.
2011 — Dwight Howard, Orlando
African American women are more likely to die from breast cancer than white women, according to the American Cancer Society.
"If that's the only thing we can pass, then I'm certainly open to it," he said. "But that's not going to solve the problem because once the child , or now-grown student , gets through, what's going to happen to them? Are they going to sit here in legal limbo? Are they going to have to go back to their country of origin and get in line to then come back? Well, at that point they think of themselves as American."
Attorney Mark O'Mara said on his website Friday he expects to receive that evidence on Monday. Under Florida law, this so-called discovery would normally be made public at the same time.
Sleep is particularly critical for teenagers. Recent studies show that during the teen years, the body's circadian rhythm (internal biological clock) is temporarily reset, telling a person to fall asleep later and wake up later. The exact reason for this shift in the internal clock is not known, however we do know this can make it harder for teens to fall asleep at bedtime, and sleepiness during the day can become a big problem.
Catcher Brayan Peña had not started back-to-back games prior to Friday's series opener against the Twins. Now, he's scheduled to start three in a row.
Hubble gave all the fireplaces a simple-but-substantial cantera-stone surround. In the kitchen, she painted the dark cabinetry white, moved an awkward closet and traded the immense granite-topped island for marble.
With his lead down to 1 shot over Kevin Na, his 4-iron came up short of the 17th green and plugged into the face of the bunker. Els blasted out to 6 feet and made that one for par.
Olympia 15, Lake Nona 4
“This is a unique opportunity to promote MetLife, the leading life insurance company in the U.S., at a new state-of-the-art NFL facility,” Beth Hirschhorn, now MetLife’s chief marketing officer, said in 2008. “It will not only deliver tremendous national exposure, but it also allows us to create a brand experience for sports fans and concert goers.”
Oh, well. I hadn't come for the waters; I had come to see my daughter Shana and son-in-law Seb and granddaughter Satie. Also to watch some rehearsals of the new circus show Shana is co-directing with Seb. Also to get all goofy about my grandchild, because that's the point of having a 3 1/2-year-old in your life.
Suddenly, the door swung open. Chong said he was badly dehydrated and cramped, and it took him some time to realize he was being saved.
Per-mile passenger revenue -- a closely watched revenue measure for airlines -- rose 5.2 percent. United's closest competitor, Delta Air Lines Inc., saw passenger revenue rise 14 percent.
After Overholt's parents divorced, he moved with his father.
Rep. Dave Schatz, R-Sullivan, said that occupational diseases were handled through workers' comp for 84 years before lawmakers changed it seven years ago. He agrees with the proposed change.
The best time to see them is usually at night in March or April in Brecksville Reservation, when it's about 40 degrees and raining.
German wooden toys seem sturdy and rather quaint. But a wooden duck, sold for babies as young as a year, has a pull cord about 33 inches long -- a potential strangulation hazard.
The next morning, workers were baffled to find a bronze animal loitering on Broad Street. Because Di Modica did not have a permit to display the bull in public, the sculpture was towed away after several hours and impounded in the guts of a Queens truck company parking lot, according to news clippings.
The whole A4 family, including the S4 performance sedan and A5 and S5 coupe and convertible, gets a number of upgrades to features found on the Allroad, including a data connection that provides Google Earth satellite photos and mobile Wi-Fi. Audi also simplified some of the cars' controls. Exterior changes include new grille, headlights, hood and bumpers.
Hernandez. The Patriots needed him to come up big, given Gronkowski’s injury, and he did up until the drop on the final drive. That said, take a look at how he watches Woodhead at the tail end of a 19-yard catch-and-run in the fourth quarter. He’s just standing there. If he keeps going and blocks Grant, Woodhead gets a lot more than 19. Woodhead broke two tackles but could’ve used help after that.
County town has stirred with controversy recently, with the mayor and two part-time city employees resigning following a flap over police pay.
A man was killed and another was badly injured when the Ford Taurus they were in struck a tree in northwest suburban Cary early Saturday.
CAMDEN - A Westville woman whose eight-minute assault on her then-boyfriend aboard a RiverLine train went viral has been sentenced to four months in the Camden County Jail.
If I had to guess, the Yankees will end up moving Robertson into the closer's role, which isn't a bad way to go. He certainly can do the job. It's the safe move. But his value when it come to getting those huge outs earlier in games can't be overlooked. Losing Robertson in that spot will hurt the Yankees.
South Fork American: For an exciting all-around trip for family and friends, head to Chili Bar. Not too tame, not too wild, about 20 miles of Class III whitewater in the Sierra foothills. I cruised past last weekend - hot days and high water, with the season open and about to launch in full-blast mode. One of the most popular rafting runs in America.
Jersey City communications director Stan Eason said thousands of people live in the downtown area and those on or above the fifth floors of their buildings will experience no or low water pressure. He said this water main break is similar to the rupture of a 35-inch-wide pipe a week ago and is in the same location.
There are several ways to do this.
By contrast, the Minnesota Department of Natural Resources punished Rathman in 2002 for cutting down environmentally critical bulrush to create access for his boat and water scooters. Crow Wing officials also say Rathman's man-made beach is too large and lets more unfiltered storm water flow into the lake.
Actually, they are more domesticated than cats. A feral cat can live just fine without any help from humans, but no domesticated ferret can survive long without food and shelter provided by humans. Plus, all pet ferrets that are sold commercially have been neutered or spayed, so even if they could survive independently from humans, they could not breed or reproduce.
"People know about pneumonia coming through contact with air," Sayadi said. "Rarely are people aware of getting pneumonia through food going down into the respiratory tract. Nothing other than air should go to lungs."
Mayor Sara Presler said she realizes each lawsuit Flagstaff faces for either enforcing or failing to enforce the immigration measure could cost the city in roads, police officers or staff. But she said it's better to be proactive than reactive.
The gloomsayers have been predicting the end of the U.S. Postal Service since the advent of the telegraph  then the telephone, the computer and the Internet.
Nadya Suleman, known to most as Octomom after giving birth to octuplets, has $1 million in debts (and $50,000 in assets) and has filed for Chapter 7 bankruptcy protection.
The good news: "The fact that we're back to 3,000 doesn't mean we're back in a bubble," Burkett said.
Bottom line: Done talking him up.
“The sooner it opens, the sooner we can start saving money,” he said.
At the Kentucky Horse Park, they will ride against each other and dozens of the best competitors from the U.S. and abroad. As luck would have it, a random draw put Doug 24th in the order of go, while his sister is 25th.
For all their drama, they do have a lot of talent. David Ortiz! They aren't as good as, say, the Rangers, who are still No. 1, but they don't belong in the same depths as the Cubs, either.
Also, one Los Angeles Police Department officer downtown was struck in the helmet with a skateboard during a minor skirmish with protesters. She was brought to a local hospital and was listed in good condition.
Reading/concert: Mike Doughty, "The Book of Drugs" 8 p.m. Feb. 22. (tavern). $20.
Clayton, which finished third as a team last spring, has not been challenged this season. The Greyhounds have impressive wins over Westminster (11-1), MICDS (7-0) and Ladue (6-1). They will get a big challenge at the Tournament of Champions, scheduled for April 27-28 at MICDS. That tournament features the top teams from Missouri, such as Rockhurst, Pembroke Hill and Rock Bridge.
"It's a family decision for us, too. I'm really looking forward to making this. Once I make my decision, there won't be any changing. I'm just going to focus on winning states for my high school and getting ready for coming in early.
So, you think you know everything about Surprise? Test your knowledge of people, places and events with this quiz.
California legislators are scheduled to take up more than 650 bills in committee this week, which is just one hint about what's wrong in the State Capitol.
"Art is always going to imitate life and what’s happening on the streets," says the Grammy-winning Franklin, 41, who is one of the most popular recording artists in urban contemporary gospel, a subgenre that fuses the devotional intensity of church music with the sound of modern mainstream radio. "What we were talking about in gospel in the ’60s reflected what was happening then. We’re still talking, but the subject matter is going to be different. The important thing is that it’s still the Gospel."
Santa seemingly squints in the sun, throwing a Hawaiian thumb-and-pinky "hang loose" shaka sign, his white-fur-trimmed red shirt open wide to reveal a big tanned tummy. The statue of a tropical St. Nick sits next to a huge "Tutu Mele" – "Merry Granny," as Mrs. Claus is called – who has hiked up her skirt to catch a cool trade wind.
WHERE TIMING IS EVERYTHING
The sectarian battle between Shia and Sunni continues to be a source of division and conflict in the Muslim world even after all these centuries.
P.F. Chang's ranks as the 84th largest employer in Arizona with more than 1,600 employees here, according to The Republic. Its stock-market capitalization of $1 billion puts it among the state's most highly valued corporations.
Nutrition information per serving (values are rounded to the nearest whole number): 130 calories; 40 calories from fat (33 percent of total calories); 5 g fat (2 g saturated; 0 g trans fats); 55 mg cholesterol; 11 g carbohydrate; 9 g protein; 1 g fiber; 330 mg sodium.
They had just one phone conversation after he took over in Happy Valley, and it started with Paterno telling him that he was glad “another Brown man” got the job. Paterno, undergoing chemotherapy for lung cancer at the time, told him what made the place special for him and his family.
-- Batum led the Blazers with 24 points, the first time he scored at least 20 points since March 3 and the fifth time he's scored at least 24 points this season.
"McIntosh, how he keeps dodging bullets, I don't know," said Steve Ard, an area restaurant owner who has three children in the district. "He's the problem."
Wes Browning, chief of the National Weather Service office in Weldon Spring, said the Missouri's rise underscores the warning of a greater chance of major flooding on the river this summer. The Army Corps of Engineers, which manages the reservoirs upriver, has said it must discharge water at a record rate through August because of heavy snowmelt and record springtime rain in Montana and the Dakotas.
I have some low wet areas for most of the year, so I plant Bee Balm, Monarda didyma, as well as other plants that are moisture tolerant.
Specialties: Deviled eggs; oysters Rockefeller; salad with green goddess dressing; 28-ounce rib eye for two; chicken fried steak.
Fossil Ridge: 1 2 — 3
He agrees partly with your description about the rough, but said the decision not to mow was based on manpower and fuel consumption. "We never said the makeover would take place overnight," he said. "We inherited some pretty rough property from the city. It is going to take some time. We mow the greens every day and the fairways are mowed three times a week. It is a work in progress."
But I also felt fear.
Charlotte wrote two more novels, "Shirley" and "Villette." She struggled for more than two years to convince her father to let her marry the church curate in 1854. She was finally wed in 1854, only to die nine months later.
"I had no discipline. I had all the talent in the world. You know, great body, great genes. But I had no work ethic and I had no discipline. The better you get, the harder you have to work. The better I got, the lazier I got."
While understated in postgame interviews, Beltran and the Cardinals overwhelmed Burnett (1-2) in three innings. The Cardinals' top four batters reached base in 11 of their first 12 plate appearances. The one time they didn't was Rafael Furcal's sacrifice fly. The Cardinals had a 12-1 lead after three innings, and the only spot in the order without a time on base was pitcher Lance Lynn's.
The Yankees’ closer, in likely his last season, expresses amusement when a bad game or two prompts people to wonder about his long-term effectiveness. That’s because Rivera always gets the last laugh.
Charlene Seidle, senior vice president of the Jewish Community Foundation, said Mrs. Thaler was not just generous with her financial resources, but with her volunteerism as well.
Maybe it's the front four. Maybe it's Eli Manning. But for whatever reason, the New York Giants are a bad matchup for Tom Brady and the New England Patriots.
"The Postal Service is at a crossroads," Postmaster General Patrick Donahoe said recently at a House hearing. "Our business model is broken. We have insufficient revenue to cover our costs. ... If the Postal Service were a private company, we would be engaged in Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceedings."
Phew, there's a way to economize.
THE BASICS OF WRITING A BUSINESS PLAN: This three-hour workshop will take place from 6-9 p.m. Feb. 9 at the University of Missouri Extension Center, 260 Brown Road, St. Peters. Participants will learn the key components of a business plan, as well as guidelines for style and appearance to help create a more professional look for their business plans. Cost is $49. Registration is required by
The idea to reward good driving through a "Speed Camera Lottery" gained wheels after winning a contest sponsored by Volkswagen. The concept is simple: Takes a portion of fines paid by ticketed speeders and give it to random travelers caught obeying the law. Traffic cameras provide the evidence for both ends of the process.
"They wanted to see what I looked like," she said in the interview. "Did I look like an Eskimo?"
The Mercury News analysis shows that success was especially likely when the bills were sponsored by businesses and industry groups. Almost half of those bills ended up signed by the governor — a far higher percentage than bills that had no sponsor.
Wrapping up local boys finishers: Timberland senior Cory Jones finished third in the Class 4 800; Timberland sophomore Mitchell Greer finished eighth in the 100; Holt junior Kenny Cushing finished sixth in the 1,600; and St. Charles West junior Christian Kirk tied for second in the Class 3 high jump with a mark of 6-6.
It was ironic that the issue that a Target supervisor was initially concerned about - the length of time it would take to check out - ended up taking twice as long because of something with the store's computer.
Santorum, who dined on eggs, hot sausage and a specialty local Italian bread, demurred when asked whether he was harming his future political prospects by remaining in the race. He said he hadn’t given any thought to his chances to be the GOP nominee in 2016.
72 percent: Projected growth in jobs for biomedical engineers from 2008 to 2018, the fastest growing occupation. Education: bachelor's degree. New jobs: 11,600. Median pay in 2008: $77,400.
'Scheduling conflicts'
Corrupt former Jersey City Deputy Mayor Leona Beldini now resides in a housing unit at a Texas federal prison where she is number 30118-050.
Rockholt said he expects Diamond to be ice-free by about the third week of May.
Sharon Murphy said on the web site, “The congenital condition was diagnosed when Brittany was a teenager and that "she always had the best medical care for it."
Countless drawings like these, attributed to the Hohokam Indians, are up and down Hieroglyphic Canyon. Archaelogists say the petroglyphs range from 200 to 2,000 years old, as new ones were added over the years.
Texas Congressman Ron Paul finished in third place in what turned out to be the closest Iowa caucus in history.
"There is a lot of talk about Amyworld and what it means. But Amyworld is not synonymous with irresponsibility," Nelson said. She is a mother who cares deeply about her family, he said.
Councilman Jim Crooks adamantly opposed the agreement because of the possibility of revenue sharing. He proposed alternate legislation, the “Business Attraction Protocol,” which had been created as a companion piece for the county.
De la Madrid pushed for more political opening, at least in local elections, but in the end was thwarted by PRI hard-liners who employed well-honed trickery to deny victory to the conservative National Action Party, or PAN, in the governor's race in the northern state of Chihuahua in 1986.
Illinois state Rep. Greg Harris agreed. "A lot of us here in Illinois are watching what Maryland does," said Harris, a Democrat who represents part of Chicago and is pushing a same-sex marriage bill. He said his colleagues kept an eye on the "thoughtful debate" in Maryland and watched how lawmakers here "gave a lot of consideration and decided that full equality is the right thing do."
Sendak has such a marvelous way of being straight with kids.
More important, the Internet puts a trove of original documents and other primary sources of information at people's fingertips. Instead of relying on middlemen to do research for us, we now can go directly to the sources that Britannica writers and Wikipedia contributors used. In a sense, the entire point of education is to develop the ability to think critically — to sift through the data and draw the right conclusions. That's a lesson that kids don't learn by rewriting Britannica entries into term papers.
The attraction also survived Chattanooga's reputation in the mid-20th century as one of the country's most polluted cities. The air is cleaner now thanks to strict regulations, and Chattanooga, surrounded by mountains and ridges, now calls itself "the scenic city."
Revenue: $11.9 million.
The one-cent tax in 2010 generated $140 million in revenue countywide. That year, the point-of-sale cities put $12.8 million in the pool.
Why else the mad dash? Obama noted in an interview with ABC News the other day that his health program won't be phased in until 2013. That's four years from now. The problem that Obama describes of rising health-care costs bankrupting the government is also a long-term issue, one that needn't be addressed in pell-mell fashion over the next two weeks.
U.S. District Judge Ancer L. Haggerty sentenced the 61-year-old Eggleston this morning to 16 years in prison for crossing state lines to have sex with children.
Tom Gose couldn't be disappointed with the results.
"It just seems like there's a lot of balls up in the air," Senjem said. "I'm not sure the balls have moved a lot on this one. That's not being critical -- it just really hasn't."
Instead of the dining car, though, we chose to have most of our meals in the quiet and intimate Pacific Parlour Car, though the menu was limited. It became our home away from home for meals, for sightseeing (Puget Sound, the mountains of Cuesta Pass into San Luis Obispo, and the grand finale, the Pacific Coast at sunset) and for a wine tasting ($5 charge, and not quite as much fun as the Empire Builder's).
Turning point. Pomeranz leaving after three innings didn't affect the outcome as much as the week. The Rockies can't continue on this path — where the bullpen carries a bigger workload than the rotation. Pomeranz was forced to leave early with the injury with Alex White (season debut) and rookie Christian Friedrich (big league debut) pitching Tuesday and Wednesday. Pomeranz could have his next start pushed back if his right quad doesn't heal quickly.
"Kill the Irishman." It's people who had the kind of grit and staying power that makes Cleveland what it is. It shows the two sides of Clevelanders: both the despair and the hope.
Name blame: The sports gossip site Deadspin carried the story this week of Cleveland native Andy Tomcho, a former Ohio State student and current Chicagoan who so loves Buckeye football that he named his child Tressel Tomcho.
ONE WORLD Trade Center is set to eclipse the Empire State Building as New York's tallest building Monday afternoon, officials said.
"He wrote of a family visit to a cave that was illuminated by electric lights: He said it was 'a lovely, fairy-like effect to the work of nature,' " she told the Associated Press in a 1987 interview. "It was just that turn of phrase," she said. "I thought, that's unusual for a kid of 11."
That has seen CBS pushing partners for new carriage fee
Exercised options: 159,931 Price:
We think the world should cut the Obama administration some slack. It's not like the president was caught regifting. Nonetheless, we recommend that for his next official present, he consider doing what most of us now do -- buy a gift card.
WASHINGTON -- Sharp questioning by the Supreme Court's conservative justices cast serious doubt Tuesday on the survival of the individual insurance requirement at the heart of President Barack Obama's historic health care overhaul.
It's too early to even think about such things as division titles, but it's impossible not to when these two teams play.
The two men – described as being in their 20s – were standing on a porch when they were shot in the 3600 block of West Cortland Street about 1:25 a.m., police said.
The 501 Levis are one of the most popular and enduring Levi Strauss styles. Romney appeared to be wearing an the off-the-shelf version that sells for about $50.
34743 Pratt Rd., $42,000
Center Saku Koivu has re-signed with the Anaheim Ducks, agreeing to a one-year deal worth $3 million to return for his 17th NHL season.
For girls, Wood adds, this growing stage happens about two years after girls start developing breasts (average age 10) and about two years after boys have an increase in the size of their testicles (average age 12).
He admitted being the leader of the organization that smuggled untold tons of drugs into the U.S., bribed and corrupted scores of public officials in Mexico, and controlled the cartel's turf through kidnappings and murders.
"You can call it an abuse, you can call it padding, I don’t care what you call it, but it wasn’t criminal," he said. "It was something that was allowed."
If you spend a little time this weekend with your Sunday newspaper, then you know The Atlanta Journal-Constitution has produced a remarkable investigation into the integrity of school-testing results from around the country.
These days, the tangy slices are used as more of a condiment. As grills are fired up for summer, you'd be hard-pressed to find an outdoor buffet without the pickles as a burger topping.
øDeveloper: EA Tiburon
øStill others are confused by marketing pitches, Abernathy says. If a borrower types "student loans" into an Internet search engine, she notes, several ads for private loans will appear before the Department of Education's website for federal student loans.
Patrice Estes of Manchester added vegetables to her front-yard garden last year. Squash, zucchini, corn and tomatoes grew around bushes, and on the front walk she added three large pots filled with mini trellises for grape tomatoes and strawberries. This spring, she plans on linking the front yard garden down along the driveway, adding an additional 16 feet of front-yard gardening. Her goal is to decrease the size of the lawn and have fun maintaining the new garden. "My front yard is sunny, and my backyard is woodland. The front yard is perfect for a garden."
Though globalization has helped corporations grow, it has a dark side. Cost considerations and cutthroat competition prompt companies to close American factories and send jobs overseas to manufacture products more cheaply. Or, at a minimum, market forces make it harder to add jobs in the U.S. when it costs less to add the same jobs overseas.
Vodafone, based in the U.K., joins a growing list of companies reviewing their operations in case the euro-zone crisis results in one or more countries leaving the currency block. Banks, trading companies, travel companies and multinationals including Tesco PLC have previously said they're making contingency plans.
Leonard said "really loud, angry people are not reflective of the general populace."
3 oz. club soda
After graduating from ASU in 2005, she got a job teaching math at Arcadia.
Baltimore (10-3) limited the Colts (0-13) to 167 yards — just 53 through three quarters. Were it not for a touchdown on the game's final play, Indianapolis would have been held without a TD for only the second time since the 2003 season opener.
The Panthers had just extended their season by virtue of a 73-59 beating of St. John’s today in the first round of the Big East Tournament. Then they saw it.
Jobs was famous -- some say notorious -- for keeping an iron grip on every step of the product development process, from conception to execution. The Macintosh, the iPod, the iPhone and the iPad all shine with his distinct design sensibility. Still, investors and consumers alike had grown accustomed in the past year to the idea of Apple without its visionary leader. Since January 2011, when Jobs went on his third medical and Cook again took over, most observers expected that Jobs would not return to full-time, active duty. Yet investors and customers remained confident in the company.
The bridge board will seek money from Proposition 63, a statewide tax levied on incomes of $1 million or more, which voters approved in 2004 to generate money for mental health programs. The board is also hoping to raise money from foundations, corporations and individuals.
Frank Moe arrived at the steps of the State Capitol today after a 350-mile sled dog voyage that started in Grand Marais to raise awareness about sulfide mining pollution.
Ineson and his colleagues have concluded that some producers will be forced to cap their wells this winter, even if the weather is normal.
And what is he asked about? The linguistic accomplishments of a 23-month-old baby.
Both Schweich and Montee pledge to serve out the full four-year term if elected.
“Peter and the Starcatcher” playwright Rick Elice: “Cellphones. Tell someone, ‘Turn it off,’ they push back with: ‘Don’t tell me what to do. I expect an important call. I’m allowed.’ ”
There was laughter, there was awe, there was catcher Vance Wilson, one of Inge's closest friends on the team, who had seen the show from near home plate.
The next re-energizing wave hit the Ewa side, with more tropical additions and transformations at sprawling Hilton Hawaiian Village, which had already brought the long-neglected Duke Kahanamoku Lagoon back to life; the opening of the boutique Modern Honolulu, originally a partnership between Ian Schrager and Marriott called the Edition Waikiki; and the takeover of the Ilikai Hotel by savvy affordable-chic hoteliers Aqua Hotels & Resorts. These hotels have easy access to Ala Moana Shopping Center, which has an unparalleled food court and continues to assemble a unique collection of stores that will woo even non-shoppers to browse.
"We are going through some exponential growth because people are getting it," said Jodi Berg, president and chief executive officer of the 91-year-old company and the fourth generation at the helm. "They're getting that food is fuel."
The shop owner, Andre Howard, was "providing information to ATF on large firearms purchases," Hurley later wrote his boss, U.S. Atty. Dennis K. Burke. Howard also "expressed concerns about the cooperation he was providing and whether he was endangering himself," Hurley wrote.
Details: 7:30 p.m. Thursday-Friday, May 10-11. Scottsdale Center for the Performing Arts, 7380 E. Second St. $15-$20. 480-499-8587, scottsdaleperformingarts.org.
So at the end of this long day’s journey into night, after the attendance-deprived Jaguars tried to swoop in at the 11th hour, the Jets still had a chance to drop out of the Tim Tebow Sweepstakes when the Broncos insisted they were owed $5 million in salary advanced to Tebow through 2014.
"It's definitely not the first thing I think about when I think of Jersey City," he said. "I mean, I doubt most people know that's a possibility."
A total of $700 million in debt has been retired in recent years.
Sveum said Marmol just needs to trust his fastball more and receive regular work to maintain his "feel" on the mound.
Among the first functions to be outsourced, in 1989, was the operation of the Wolstein Center, a 15,000-seat arena owned by the university that holds sports, concerts and other events.
While the decrease was good, it must not lessen the urgency of homelessness, said Vickie L. Riddle, executive director of the Homeless Services Coalition of Greater Kansas City, who released the 2012 point in time count.
That's what Wainwright is seeking.
"Yesterday we played well for the majority of it," Jans said. "Right now we're having trouble stopping the bad and getting back to the good. We have to figure out a way to close the door. "
After a year on the junior varsity and a second season with the varsity, the committee in March denied Keeling permission to play next fall. An April decision by the panel's appeals committee affirmed the original decision, and said it did not consider his size and strength as potential criteria for being disqualified.
Bud: Does Elway + Byner + Jordan + Albert + Manny + Boozer + Noah + Renteria equal Cleveland's Most Hated . . . or now Rajon Rondo? -- Bob
3015 Iowa Av, $20,495
But that's how they dealt with allergies in those olden days.
Belichick has four Rutgers alums on his roster heading to the Super Bowl. Devin McCourty, picked No. 27 in the 2010 NFL Draft, and Nate Jones are cornerbacks; Tiquan Underwood plays wide receiver and defensive lineman Alex Silvestro is on the Patriots practice squad.
She is hardly alone in her assessment. Teachers, students, parents, judges, and other experts agreed.
"This is an unacceptable breach, and it’s one that we have to make sure doesn’t happen again," Corzine said. "We have to use these unfortunate situations as learning experiences."
The recall targets Councilmen F. Richard Jones, Pat McKinley and Don Bankhead. Some residents felt those council members didn't do enough to address the public's concerns in the aftermath of Kelly Thomas' death, largely spurring the recall attempt.
"We want to make sure we're ready for what's coming," Yates said. "If we don't do this, there's going to be a mess out there."
1. Derek Jeter, NYY ... 3,004
Others in camp with Bay Area ties are former Cal rowers Nareg Guregian and Zach Vlahos, Stanford's David Banks, John Cornelius and Silas Stafford and USF graduate student Marcus McElhenney.
While an optimistic negotiator might have seized on the language that dictates the monitor will not assume the role of the sheriff, skeptics in Arpaio's office focused on a passage that gave the monitor "the opportunity to review and approve all new guidelines and plans before their implementation" in the Sheriff's Office.
(06-20) 13:40 PDT SAN FRANCISCO -- With a few words in the new state budget, lawmakers will ban spending taxpayer money on intercollegiate athletics - and end a controversy that started when a sharp-eyed UC Berkeley professor found that university officials had changed details of the law.
Every September, cows and calves are driven into corrals. (The older bulls, "too big and too mean" to be involved, segregate themselves, said Craig Pugsley, the park's visitor services coordinator.) The animals are branded, checked by vets and vaccinated. About 300 are auctioned off, and the rest are released back into the park.
"As far as we know, no other library in the country will have this range of capabilities," said Hodel, who has pushed to make the Orange County system more tech-savvy during her 10-year tenure. "This is very cool, very edgy."
5:30 — She says she is trying to be nice and as "un-wave-making" as she can while denying his advances.
Ganigan's niece, Michell Shue, tells the Honolulu Star-Advertiser (http://bit.ly/JqG3pS ) that Ganigan never fully recovered from injuries suffered in a March 2010 attack by 21-year-old Matthew Kupa outside a bar in Waipahu, Hawaii.
But Commissioner Jeanne Fox disagreed.
Dine/Drink: Cabane a Sucre Au Pied de Cochon, 11382 Rang de la Fresniere, Mirabel, 450-258-1732, cabaneasucreaupieddecochon.com. Chef Martin Picard's over-the-top shack, about 45 minutes west of the city, is sold out for the season, but mark your calendar for midnight Dec. 1, when the place starts taking reservations for 2013. Then act quickly. Set menu, $57.
JTT: Owen O’Connor 2 hits.
No fewer than 31 farmers are listed on the menu. The rest is foraged by chefs and bartenders.
Grand opening festivities are free and open to the public. Activities include free pet nail trims with a donation to the Humane Society, facility tours, grooming demonstrations, refreshments, raffles and more.
NEWARK, N.J. (AP) — The Philadelphia Flyers better start worrying about the New Jersey Devils, and soon — real soon.
"At this time, it appears to us the actions of the security guard were justified," Howard said in a statement. "However, if subsequent evidence reveals intentions to the contrary, as in every case, the District Attorney's Office will be led by the facts."
Violence sometimes takes on sexual overtones, which teachers must handle, but often don't anticipate.
Where to watch: It will be aired on Thirteen and NJTV. You can also watch it streamed on NJ.com.
Through five innings the Cardinals lead, 3-1.
Neighbors gave varying timelines for how long the residents at the Lambeth Court address had been gone. Police said the residents had been renting the home.
The hike around Elephant Mountain is a study in contrasts.
"I have never been opposed to the program. . .or the idea that medical marijuana is available to those truly in need,’’ Christie said. "My entire argument all along was to put together a program that avoids the pitfalls of California and Colorado and was medical-based and responsive.’’
McGordon is replacing state champion Malcolm Jones, Sarge Johnson, who did not make the trip. Also not competing are champions Cody Stone (114), Indy PAL/Christamore; and Ralph Thomas (super heavyweight), L.T. Warriors.
TACOMA, Wash. -- Teachers in the Washington city of Tacoma have voted overwhelmingly in favor of a strike.
Greg also took the time to group the 40-some letters into four bundles so that Shane's son, Gabe, would be about the same age as Grandpa's Jayne Anne as the letters arrived.
But urban growth increasingly made it a flood-prone sewer. Its path through Forest Park was encased temporarily in a wooden culvert for the 1904 World's Fair. There was talk of a permanent solution, but the $4 million price tag kept the drawings on a City Hall shelf.
Another stalwart for making Old Towne all R-1 was real estate broker Dan Slater. Slater told the council that some bonehead named "Frank Mickelldeit" wrote an article in which he erroneously suggested that property owners who had their property downzoned from apartments to single-family-only would lose property value.
In May, 44 of 46 Republican senators sent a letter (story and pdf of letter) to Obama threatening to block any nomination hearing, regardless of the candidate, unless the White House agreed to:
509 Eagle Manor Ln, $478,500
He acknowledged that police have to consider that McCann may be dead despite hopes that she is alive.
Athletics update: Last Wednesday in New York, former Indian OF Coco Crisp went 4-for-4 with two homers and five RBI. ... May 4 in Oakland, Cahill moved to 5-0 with a 3-1 victory over the Indians.
2 ounces Nolet Silver Gin.
In Greece, Athens continues to upgrade its urban landscape, carrying forward a new wave of improvements sparked by the 2004 Olympic Games. The New Acropolis Museum, a glassy modern temple for ancient art, is set to open in June. Located at the foot of the Acropolis, the new museum houses artifacts and exhibits that were previously in the old hilltop museum (now closed). The Greeks are upfront with their hope that someday the new museum will also house the famous Elgin Marbles, now on view at the British Museum in London. They've actually built a room in anticipation of the (unlikely) return of those treasures, which many Greeks consider British plunder. Cafes, street vendors and frequent special events now border three sides of the Acropolis, thanks to expansion of the nearby pedestrian walkways of Dionysiou Areopagitou and Apostolou Pavlou.
Arellano Felix pleaded guilty in January to racketeering and money-laundering conspiracy charges, admitting that the cartel imported hundreds of tons of drugs into the U.S., using the profits to bribe Mexican officials and outfit assassination squads. Investigators estimate that the cartel killed about 1,000 people during a roughly 16-year period.
Yes, the back seat was full of other bags and boxes. "They had it down to a science," Evon says.
El Morocco: 2203 Morello Ave. (at Odin Drive), Pleasant Hill. (925) 671-0132. elmorocco.net.
Vinas has pleaded guilty to murder conspiracy and faces life in prison when sentenced. But he's hoping the government will write a memorandum in his behalf to the sentencing judge, talking about his cooperation not only with the United States--but eight foreign governments.
All 20 hands at the union hall in Southfield were raised for President Barack Obama. No one chose the other option: uncommitted.
4224, Maryanne Garcia, Ewing, 3:51:04.
Robinson, who wrote his first song in the first grade for a school play, went on to become a Motown vice president and one of the studio's most prolific songwriters and hitmakers.
Fernandez said her son "didn't even know I called 911. I was emotional. I thought the police would have a talk with him. I told them, 'Don't hurt my son, just talk to him.' "
"Our hearts go out to him and his family," Carney said of Weinstein. "We condemn his kidnapping in the strongest terms and call for his immediate release. The U.S. government will continue making every effort to see Mr. Weinstein released safely to his family, but we cannot and will not negotiate with al-Qaeda."
With little permanence, they grab onto certain precious objects  a favorite piece of clothing, a blanket, a stuffed animal.
These considerations have nothing to do with the questions of guilt or innocence or cost (which should be persuasive enough) but a matter of logic and common sense.
“There was a point in the first half, and I was thinking 'You better not cry,''' Roy said. “I mean, serious. I mean, there was a moment where I felt really sorry for myself. Then I was like, nah, you can't be sorry for yourself. I'm a grown man, but there was a moment there that I felt sorry for myself. Especially when I think I can still help.''
23137 Socia St., $84,000
The Los Angeles Times obituary department contributed to this report.
Walnut Street, 11:52 a.m.: A vehicle was stolen.
This is the hard part.
St. Paul police are investigating a shooting Thursday that left a state legislator's daughter grazed in the chest by a bullet.
On my last day at work, as I was walking out the door to go work for an exciting up-and-coming company with user-friendly equipment (Apple Computer), I opened the door to the machine room, and yelled into the room, "Good riddance!"
"But I'm more comfortable with Botox," he says. "I've been using it longer, and I know exactly how much to use where."
He was charged with criminal mischief, desecrating a monument and a weapons charge, police said. Ellis was released on bail in December, and the case is still pending.
We can try to shape that outcome, or we can let our adversaries shape it in ways that we will surely regret.
1st District police detectives, however, say many thieves are blatant, like one nabbed a block from a scrap yard, ready to sell
"With this partnership, we are accessing a platform with an experienced management team and a solid track record in the Mexican telecommunications industry," Televisa Chairman Emilio Azcarraga Jean said in the statement.
But Cole said the group was missing internal benchmarks that were unknown to city officials.
At that time, the inevitable transition to medical dependency led only one place, she says: a traditional nursing-home setting where open rooms were crammed with beds, privacy was non-existent and quality of life diminished.
The flub was “particularly painful” because the exchange performed as designed “99.9% of the time” before Friday and had undergone testing for months, Ratterman said.
Warren County Prosecutor Mike Wright said Schmitt had said all along that he didn't remember what happened before the crash. Schmitt's attorney, Henry Miller, said his client took the plea agreement because he wanted to take responsibility for what happened.
Normally this wouldn't be a big deal, but we are traveling without our children for the very first time since having them four years ago, and we really wanted this to be a great vacation. This hotel is so, so far from a 4.5-star ... gorgeous lobby, but the rooms haven't been redone in a long time. Can you give me any guidance as to how to try and resolve this? - Anna
Raskin, a Takoma Park resident, has many fans in the state. The Maryland Consumer Rights Coalition named her its consumer advocate of the year in 2009. Foreclosure-prevention activists said she was a key player in the 2008 push to give homeowners more time and notification before lenders can schedule an auction. On Thursday, banks in the state praised her tenure, particularly the effort she spent getting to know each of them when she came on board in 2007.
Braun explained that menus are rotated so that someone flying out of town and returning a few days later will not get the same selections.
"We do know where there is competition, the airfares are more favorable," said CEO Douglas Baker, who is also chairman of Greater MSP.
Surrounded, wall-to-wall, by hookey-playing fans in Indianapolis Colts colors, these two are easy to spot in their shiny blue-and-red outfits and blaring Giants logos. Dotson concocts a tear-jerking story about boyhood heroes, like Phil Simms and Bill Parcells, and how he has loved the Giants practically since birth. But two minutes into the fairy tale, he comes clean.
Laurie Solet's Clayton location will close on March 31.
Hotel general manager Patty Rotermund said two male employees were on duty when a woman walked in wearing a sweatshirt, sweatpants and house slippers. The woman said she had a weapon but did not display it, Rotermund said.
But when it dawned on Checo that Jones had made himself a "ghost" — with the prepaid phones, the alias, the out-of-state plates — and he lashed out.
This continues the trend of earlier and earlier opening times to kick off the Black Friday weekend, which is one of the biggest shopping events of year. With the earlier opening times, retailers hope to drive more sales during what is expected to be a decent, though not a blockbuster, holiday shopping season.
Just because optimists are in the majority doesn't mean they're right, but we can certainly hope that the reader who predicts Dow 6,000 -- a drop of more than 50 percent -- is wrong. Yikes! The most bullish stock-market prediction is for a 20 percent gain to 14,629.
Visitors are encouraged to bring a new unwrapped toy worth $5 (no toy weapons) to donate to Toys for Tots. Ten percent of the proceeds from any art pieces sold that evening will go to Toys for Tots, according to Zuma Press CEO Scott Mc Kiernan.
12424 Leigh Ln, $155,000
Others, however, applauded Komen.
"We are very concerned that regulated industries will exert undue political influence on scientific deliberations, and (we) call on Commissioner Martin to impose safeguards to promote transparency, ethics, and restrict conflicts of interest," Wolfe said.
"He used bad judgment," Abdellah said. "That’s what youth does. It has nothing to do with criminal intent. This young man is not a murderer."
To curtail predatory towing, the Legislature could cap towing charges, award triple damages against the bad guys and follow California's lead in preserving the rights of the vehicle owner.
"While the economic recovery has been sluggish, it continues to add jobs, a key driver for a housing market recovery. Historically low interest rates coupled with affordability make it one of the best times in history to buy a new home," said Gene Stumpf III, president of the Home Builders Association of St. Louis.
Oden is done in Portland.
Speaking of fuel, after 87 miles, you will have burned more calories than the typical person should eat in an entire day. You need to eat. Nutritionists call it recovery.
The cameras are part of a fiveyear state pilot program to test the effectiveness of the equipment on traffic safety, said Tim Greeley, a spokesman for the state Department of Transportation. Gov. Jon Corzine signed the legislation creating the program last year.
Sue Mack, a licensed planner who was first voted onto the nine-member board in 1996 was voted in as president, as Marvin Adames, a municipal prosecutor in Newark, was elected vice president.
That underscores the importance of disability insurance. Such coverage will replace at least a portion of your income if you're unable to work due to illness or injury. Your employer may offer group coverage.
Carter said she believes Jones lied to doctors out of loyalty. "He told me it was an accident and that he didn’t want the guy who shot him to get in trouble," she said. "Charles was like that. He would do anything for you."
There was a time when children attending birthday parties received simple favors like a noisemaker or a trinket for winning Pin the Tail on the Donkey. Today they often get bulging bags of toys, not unlike those handed out to Oscars attendees. These sometimes cost more than the presents brought to the party.
2433 DEWEY AVE $20,199
This is ridiculous on so many levels it's hard to know where to begin. Maybe first that Tressel even wanted to spend his Sundays hitting the rewind button anywhere other than in the comfort of his living room.
According to UNOS, 332 people over age 65 received a new heart last year. The majority of transplants occur in 50- to 64-year-olds. Cheney's surgery led some to question whether he was too old to be given a new heart.
Posted: Tuesday, July 6, 2010 8:21 pm
Even in defeat, Santorum sounded defiant, not even mentioning Romney in his 15-minute speech. "We made a decision over the weekend that while this presidential race for us is over for me, and we will suspend our campaign effective today, we are not done fighting," he announced, standing with some family members in front of a wrinkled American flag (an aide brought an iron, but there hadn't been enough time to use it).
Roseanna Vitro, one of New Jersey’s preeminent jazz vocalists, returns from a nationwide CD release tour to celebrate her new record, “The Music of Randy Newman.” She’ll perform Saturday at 8 and 10 p.m. at Trumpets Jazz Club, 6 Depot Square, Montclair.
"It is a tight-knit group," Koll said. "It's like a little family. That sounds really cheesy, but it's true. Those guys kid each other like brothers, and they make fun of me and Shalane like sisters. It's so fun. It's really fun to come to practice every day."
Scientists warned that the first tsunami waves are not always the strongest, and officials said people in Hawaii and along the West Coast should remain vigilant. Still, the tsunami warning was downgraded to an advisory in Hawaii, and Gov. Neil Abercrombie said the islands were "fortunate almost beyond words."
During the training mission last week of the coast of Morocco, the Osprey crashed after taking off from the USS Iwo Jima. Along with Cpl.. Kerns, another Marine was killed and two injured.
I don't know whether the Broncos would have issued AFC West championship hats or shirts had they finished the season with a win, but it was the strangest division-clinching locker room I've seen, caught between disappointment at another loss and joy at the puzzling result.
Jo Ann Gora told the University Senate on Thursday that its faculty salaries have become increasingly less competitive and that legislators are "incredibly unsympathetic."
No officers were injured in the incident.
Blazers guard Jamal Crawford: “I thought it was up and down. My shot wasn’t going. They were good shots and my teammates told me to stay aggressive and to keep shooting."
The Rosenblum camp vigorously disputes that there's any "deal" between Rosenblum and marijuana advocates.
Luis Eduardo Schmidt made his pro debut with Brazil's Sao Paulo in 1997 and scored 28 goals in 117 appearances with Celta from 2000-04, helping the club to reach the Champions League for the first time. He then scored 41 goals in 136 games for Betis from 2004-09, also helping the team to its first Champions League appearance.
Public pensions, union leaders, Democrats, Republicans and Woodrow Wilson all came under fire in an hour-long speech that was part rally, part history lesson and part lecture.
"I won the Cherry Creek Invitational and the Liberty Bell, and then I kind of thought, 'Wow, my season is going really well.' I got that boost of confidence, and that definitely has carried me through the season."
"In my world, that’s character evidence against the priest," Bianchi said. "(Feliciano) murdered the priest and now he’s murdering his reputation in this courtroom."
On the roster: Jahvid Best has concussion problems. Mikel Leshoure suffered a torn Achilles tendon last fall. Kevin Smith hasn't played a full season since his rookie year, and the three other backs on the Lions' roster have 123 combined carries. So even though the Lions have spent considerable resources on the running back position the last two years (drafting Best in the first round and Leshoure in the second), they still have a need at the position.
U.S. Defense Secretary Leon Panetta praised the agreement and said implementing the agreement would improve the "vital alliance" between the U.S. and Japan.
Thu-thump, thu-thump, thu-thump.
The Cardinals don't lobby public officials frequently. But when they do, it can be for major projects, such as stadium financing or the stalled Ballpark Village development plan.
Once the couple hit their early 30s, they started focusing on having a family.
May he have a long and lucrative career I find easy to ignore, one that in no way collides with something as wonderful as college football. Is that too much to ask?
"Rick Scott backs Arizona's law. He'll bring it to Florida and let our police check if the people they arrest are here legally," the ad says.
Boston grabbed the lead for good in the third quarter and entered the fourth up 79-72. It looked as if the Blazers would concede yet another fourth quarter after Boston put together a 9-0 Celtics to go up 96-80 with just under six minutes left.
Tana McMahel, 34, spent six years in the Navy, most of it on the USS George Washington aircraft carrier as an ordnance officer. Since her discharge in July 2009, she's worked as a retail manager but yearns for a job that excites her. She's looking at becoming a biologist, maybe in watershed management.
1705 Uceyle Av, $39,000
Details: 7:30 p.m. Thursday, May 3; 7:30 and 9:30 p.m. Friday-Saturday, May 4-5. Phoenix Little Theatre, 100 E. McDowell Road. $15. 602-254-2151, scorpiusdance.com.
Jones added a unique distinction to his reputation when he helped foil a robbery attempt in Paterson just hours before tonight’s bout. Jones was on his way to meditate when he saw someone breaking into a car; he gave chase and knocked the suspect down by kicking his legs. His trainers soon caught up and helped subdue the suspect until the police arrived.
Born Feb. 12, 1952, in Ely, Cambridgeshire, England, MacCorkindale launched his career in the theater and made his West End debut in a 1974 production of George Bernard Shaw's "Pygmalion."
As expected, the Ravens continue to be extremely quiet in free agency. They've signed just one free agent of note (veteran center Matt Birk), while losing five of their own free agents, including starters Ben Grubbs, Jarret Johnson and Cory Redding.
The theme of the day: Girls in education.
Gatorama is a small attraction at which Register does much of the day-to-day labor. At a big pond he struts onto a rickety dock with a bucket of chicken parts. Watched by a half dozen tourists ensconced safely behind a secure fence, Register waves a chicken wing with his good hand. A 13-foot croc — Big Daddy — rockets out of the water like a Polaris missile and snatches the snack.
I was still contemplating how it would be served when the pizza ($14) arrived. Throughout its nine-year history, Globe has continued to make a great thin-crust pie with just enough soft yeastiness to remind me of really good bread. It's light-colored and topped with combinations such as potatoes, rosemary and fiore sardo cheese, or sopressata with a sunny-side-up egg.
He's 28 now and taking a longer view. Regardless of how this season ends, whether it is in Iowa this weekend or on the Olympic podium in London this summer, Lester plans to keep wrestling for the Army. He said he will apply to officer candidate school and continue an Army career beyond his wrestling days.
Just three minutes later, forward Juan Colorado of FDR struck again for the PSAL. He took a blazing shot from far out that ended up getting past MacIntyre who dived to his left but couldn’t make the save. Colorado scored the lone goal against the CHSAA on Saturday that proved to be the game-winner.
"So we're really focused on what we have instead of what we don't."
the power "to increase prices and push out rivals, including community pharmacies."
Separately, the finance ministry said Wednesday that Greece's state budget deficit widened sharply in the first three months of 2012 but beat the deficit target set in the 2012 supplementary budget.
For Olson, it's a thrill to have a vested interest in the company where he works and have responsibility for the financials, challenges and successes. "It's not that I wasn't always concerned about the bottom line in the past, but measuring sales every day and seeing what's happened and what activity we created, I'm much more in tune with it than I ever was before," he said. "It's pretty exciting."
And their last regular-season win over the Seahawks came on
 Shrugging off praise or rewards.
Some players appeared to be praying as fans chanted his name between periods of silence at White Hart Lane.
Baldwin-Shirey credits her school's emphasis on "21st century learning" for helping improve overall student achievement. Tuffree's 2011 Academic Performance Index of 880 has grown by 85 points in the past three years. About 80 percent of students are proficient in math and 82 percent in English.
They aren't the only rowers with Bay Area ties in such a position. Beijing gold medalists Eleanor Logan (Stanford) and Erin Cafaro (Cal) will race in women's pairs for a top-four finish to earn a berth to the Olympic team.
We love to hate tests, but we all take them. From driver's tests to the SAT, most of us grudgingly acknowledge their usefulness.
The shooting occurred just before 2 a.m. today in an apartment complex at 8173 Aragon Woods Drive. A report from the Indianapolis Metropolitan Police Department states that a man knocked on the door of an apartment and shot the two people inside.
Look, Dave, I can see you're really upset about this. I honestly think you ought to sit down calmly, take a stress pill, and think things over.
"He's not a choir boy," Gough said of his client, who was on parole from a child molestation conviction at the time of the killing. "But he's not a murderer. There's a very real chance that the murderer is walking the streets gloating that she got away with it."
At kicker, Kaeding, coming off knee surgery, missed all but the opening kickoff last season. He's out to prove he's back to form after Novak, his replacement, proved himself an NFL-caliber kicker in his absence.
A. She's left the planet.
Red Bull Air Race officials said the East Coast event was three years in the making and took the collaboration of New York City, Jersey City, the New Jersey Department of Environmental Protection, the Coast Guard, Federal Aviation Administration and several other agencies.
In a letter sent to Chiesa today, the nonprofit Common Cause accuses ALEC, a conservative bill-writing organization, of tax fraud. It says that although ALEC is registered as a charity in New Jersey, it is "primarily a lobbying organization and may therefore be in violation of its tax-exempt status."
Like I said, Siena is a very good mid-major. But when they start with the big boys, they don't fare well. (L's this year to Tennessee, Okla. St., Pitt.) Cards deal with them easily. Louisville, 72-57.
"True Grit" is rated PG-13 for some intense sequences of western violence including disturbing images.
In a nutshell: Acclaimed New York Times food writer Mark Bittman follows up his popular "How to Cook Everything" cookbooks and iPhone and iPad apps with this instructive volume of 185 everyday, step-by-step recipes. The book is designed to boost the kitchen confidence of beginning cooks, while showing even seasoned veterans how they can shop smarter, improve technique and prepare more-nutritious dishes. His five golden rules should be embraced by anyone who spends time in the kitchen: Anything you cook at home will be good; read the recipe through before starting; it's OK to serve dishes warm or at room temperature; trust your senses; be safe -- but not insane -- about cleanliness.
Rockridge, an affluent community of charming houses on leafy streets, is a wonderful place to shop.
To many of the competitors, it's the mountain of a challenge that draws them in.
"CSI: Crime Scene Investigation": Also signing off for the season -- its first with new cast member Ted Danson -- the granddaddy of the crime-forensics franchise features guest star Peri Gilpin ("Frasier") as the wife of Danson's character. (10 p.m., CBS/6)
Over the years, the Women's Fund has given more than 250 grants to various groups totaling $4.1 million. Its grants have gone to the Salvation Army, programs that help homeless teens and sexual abuse victims, and organizations that provide job training and teach self-sufficiency. It supports programs that educate low-income mothers on healthy ways to raise children. It gives money to organizations that teach girls to respect themselves and their bodies. And, yes, it gave a $22,000 grant to Planned Parenthood in 2011 that was strictly limited to exams, preventive screenings and birth control supplies for women who cannot afford them.
In the military system, the five Sept. 11 suspects had faced the death penalty, but the official would not say if the Justice Department would also seek capital punishment against the men once they are in the federal system.
Holiday scores 26, 76ers pull away in 3rd to beat Bulls 109-92 in Game 2
Inside tip: The ginger-spice cookie ($1.75) is made with organic oat flour and no wheat, eggs or dairy.
Ex-state Sen. Pedro Espada Jr.’s federal embezzlement trial screeched to a halt today after the jury revealed that one of its 12 members has “refused” to deliberate from the very beginning.
The Packers have beaten teams with a combined 45-20 regular-season record their last four games to get to Soldier Field. The Bears had to beat the sub-.500 Seahawks to secure their spot.
The folks who managed to turn travel journals and notebooks into something both essential and elegant have turned an eye toward making bags for the road. Moleskine's Travelling Collection includes a backpack, a messenger bag, a tote and the Reporter Bag, a stylish vertical shoulder bag. The matte black "leather" bag is actually polyurethane, but it's water-repellent and doesn't scratch the way leather can, and the seat belt-like shoulder strap is wide and comfortable. While it seems a little gimmicky to use the same elastic band for securing the bag that is the trademark of the company's notebooks, it actually works well and doesn't require the fumbling of snaps or the noisy rip of Velcro (and similar products). At just 9.5 by 11.75 by 2.25 inches, it's not meant to carry much more than a tablet or 13-inch laptop and some maps or magazines - but it looks good doing it.
Fisher's win sets up a battle between two career politicians, a classic liberal and conservative. Their differences on economic issues will get the most attention because the two are focused on jobs and the economy -- taking opposite sides on stimulus, trade and health-care reform.
Obama's campaign team has tried to generate a sense of urgency, telling donors they need to get involved because of Republican-leaning super PACs aiming to raise hundreds of millions of dollars to defeat the president.
For the Bulls, I would have paid that much. And thought about doing so. But Odom and Schnell, not Bulls fans, balked. So, being a team player we settled on $75 for 300 level tickets in the last row of the arena. Back against the wall-type seats. Who made that shot-type seats. Are those dancers, or muppets-type seats.
Vilma will miss out on $1.6 million in base salary in 2012, while Fujita stands to lose more than $640,000, Hargrove more than $385,000 and Smith more than $190,000. Some of those contracts were restructured this offseason, perhaps in anticipation of the punishments.
Evidently the Pilgrims brought apples with them from England and then happily discovered the crop was easy to cultivate here. Peter Stuyvesant, one of the early leaders in the settlement of New York, planted an apple orchard on his Manhattan property in 1647. That's probably not why the city became known as "The Big Apple," though.
"Our top priority was providing our patients with the top level of care right here at MetroHealth in a cost-effective manner," Stager said. "I think it boils down to providing parents access to these same services right here on the main campus. And with the affiliation agreement with Akron Children's we were able to accomplish that."
The Legislature eventually increased the fee to $100, though it later extended the validity of the licenses from four to six years.
My wife just shakes her head and asks why I continue courting pain and paying chiropractors' kids' way to college. She doesn't get it.
"There is no ego in what Will does," Sacawa said. "Nowadays, a lot of people get caught up with trying to promote themselves. That can get in the way of the quality, the craft, the journey to explore. Will is all about the exploration."
Shurmur deserves more than a year. What would changing now fix?
Ranked third in the world, Westwood could very well be the Best Player Without A Major. He has finished in the top three six times since 2008, and has had plenty of time to think about what he needs to get over the hump.
Sunday, 8 a.m.
"Basically, you're hiring someone — usually at a fairly low wage — who's going to be coming into the home and helping your loved one with some of their most intimate tasks," says Claudia Ellano-Ota, director of the Caregiver Resource Center of Orange County, one of 11 such centers in the state, all funded by California's Department of Mental Health.
It also forces workers to pay at least 15 percent of their health care costs and contribute at least 10 percent of their salaries toward their pensions.
Trick's over. Why, you ask? Because Ted Baxter will distract the viewing public into thinking that whatever required in Pakistan in terms of drone attacks, troops, commitment, money, materiel. All is warranted because of the new bogeymen. Pakistan, the ISI and the Haqqani network. Tada!
The 2006 St. Louis Cardinals won the NL Central with an 83-78 record, then won the whole thing, beating the error-prone Tigers. Taunting signs reading "Hit It to the Pitcher" bobbed in the stands in St. Louis in the World Series. So bad pitching can create a ruckus in the playoffs, too.
"Whereas others may judge Haefa's accomplishments as superior, Haefa is always looking for ways to improve herself and sharpen her skills," counselor Pamela Goss wrote when nominating her to be a Senior Standout. "She is not satisfied with the ordinary."
There are some upward-pointing indicators, which partially mitigate the downward ones. Allen Craig surely hasn't reached his ceiling yet; he's an excellent hedge against a slump by Berkman or Beltran. Greene and Descalso promise increased production from the 2B position. The Cards can reasonably expect 100 more at-bats from Matt Holliday in 2012 compared to 2011, which can only help. And one of the injury risks (Freese) carries considerable upside as long as he's healthy. But overall, the offense must replace a sure thing (Pujols) with a number of decidedly NOT sure things. Maybe the new lineup will be fine, but we shouldn't be surprised if it struggles to score.
"When you talk about projections, there's a real danger in setting expectations and then hurting your credibility by not living up to it," Paulson said. "It's one thing to say it and another thing to prove it."
Jordan Clarke of Arizona State won the competition with a best throw of 68-5 1/4.
"People don't know that much about it," says Harvey, who once put yellow roses on the hips of two Maltese dogs for their owner's birthday. "They are very skeptical about having it done to their animals."
A fourth defendant in the original indictment, Cointa Moody, is no longer charged and is expected to testify for the prosecution, James said.
Blaine, 31, is accused of shooting and killing Yucef Ellis and Eric Banks in separate robberies between 2005 and 2006, part of what prosecutors say was an 11-month scheme to rob wealthy south DeKalb residents or strong-arm suspected drug dealers of their drugs and money.
The result is a whole lot of politicians with egg on their faces scraping it off and tossing it back and forth, rather than trying to fix a system with conflicting priorities.
At the school, the urban-blues-folk experience is open to all ages. Arguably the best all-ages booking is the engaging storytelling of Fruteland Jackson at 6:30 p.m. May 6. Jackson is one of the few American artists dedicated to performing and preserving acoustic blues in a diverse range - everything from field hollers and work songs to Delta and Piedmont styles. His May 6 program is devoted to the life of the legendary Robert Johnson. In addition, Demetria Taylor, the daughter of blues great Eddie Taylor, makes her Old Town School debut on May 13 in a flashy Mother's Day set.
"The bad girls ... had the look that I liked," she wrote in her 1995 autobiography, "Rage to Survive." ''I wanted to be rare, I wanted to be noticed, I wanted to be exotic as a Cotton Club chorus girl, and I wanted to be obvious as the most flamboyant hooker on the street. I just wanted to be."
Local business representatives speaking at the meeting strongly backed the A's plans, while a Sierra Club representative and a handful of other residents said they feared the council was ready to endorse a plan that was too dependent on automobile trips to move both residents and baseball fans.
"This is wonderful news," said Christie Holderegger of Volunteers of America, which will help coordinate winter housing. "We were very nervous. Just three weeks ago, we were told there would be no money."
Cardinals' first pick in the 2011 Major League Baseball First-Year Player Draft was revealed in August 2010.
But he's very enthusiastic about the staffers in the water department who handle calls about billing. One employee in particular has spent so much time trying to resolve his problem that he declares her an "angel." She's set in motion new bills on two of his properties, saying the amounts weren't just high because they were for more than one quarter, they were actually incorrect, he told me Wednesday.
It means I know 'bull' when I see it.
"I'm really trying to supply some data that speaks to what we know how children are faring poverty-wise here in Santa Clara County," he said.
Saturday night on offense against the White Sox, the Dodgers also picked up a pair of solo home runs. Juan Rivera hit his second in two days, and new utility manJerry Hairston Jr. hit his first of the spring in the sixth to tie the score, 5-5.
See a connection?
Counsel Corp. and Capital Recovery representatives met with Procop and other officials Wednesday at Twinsburg City Hall, but made no commitment as to the future of the 2-million-square-foot Chrysler complex.
The magazine also included an essay by Ono recalling her final days with her husband.
However, police have taken swift and sometimes brutal action to break up unauthorized demonstrations, while the opposition appears to be determined to try to maintain its momentum.
The Michigan Judicial Tenure Commission charged Wayne County Circuit Judge Deborah Ross Adams with professional misconduct Thursday, saying she lied to a judge and forged a signature on a document in her 2011 divorce case.
The peace agreement between the Prophet and the Jewish community of Medina guaranteed them physical safety, security and the freedom to practice their religion.
While the combination of a six-game suspension and $5 million non-guaranteed salary created the real possibility that Williams has played his last game with the Broncos, the team was seriously entertaining the stunning possibility that Manning would be taking their first snap in the 2012 season.
By the way, do not pass go; head straight for the fried wings, so well-crisped and tender, you know there's some down home wisdom in the kitchen.
Like the other divers, Steve Gatto, who was in the first group to dive on the wreck of the Lady Mary, believes the vertical-hit scenario is improbable because of the pristine condition of the gallows, a large rectangular frame that supports the dredge. It rises high over the deck and is angled over the stern’s ramp.
These petite but sweet spots embody the hybridized agility of Temescal independents.
So when Melissa Perello streamlined her cooking to open Frances in the Castro, beverage director Paul Einbund assembled a concise, quirky mix that not only included a house wine, sold for $1 per ounce, but also everything from the 2010 Massican Annia, a $49 white Napa blend, to 2004 Jamet Cote-Rotie for $218.
The Chesterfield campus facilities are "just what we need, a great facility and campus where we can follow our mission while we attract more students," Watson said. "Our plan is to grow our enrollment and deepen our service to the community."
The movie's infamous sex scene, involving butter, was not in the original script.
He left the commission to work for the U.S. Labor Department in Kansas City. He helped develop the St. Louis Job Corps program that provided training for thousands of young people.
Creates a state crime of failure to apply for or carry "alien-registration papers." (NOT IN EFFECT)
manager and financial secretary for the a Cleveland-area plumbers union, worked with former Cuyahoga County commissioner Jimmy Dimora to land jobs for family members in exchange for goods Rybak delivered to Dimora's home.
The problem is that with Michigan State (which did stumble through a loss to Notre Dame), Nebraska, Illinois and Wisconsin, the Buckeyes' next four games after their upcoming contest with Colorado are all against teams probably better than Miami.
Coyote danger: Packs of coyotes in foothill parks can lure unleashed dogs away from you and then trap and kill them; several trails are temporarily closed to dogs at Pearson-Arastradero Preserve in Palo Alto because of coyote danger.
Both candidates grew up in underprivileged homes in Latino neighborhoods on the Southwest Side and faced multiple challenges to finish their education and embark on professional careers. They say their priorities are jobs, education and public safety. Both claim to be independent.
The Youngs say they spent some of the $725,000 in payments from Edwards supporter Rachel "Bunny" Mellon to cover Hunter's $2,700 monthly rent, give her a monthly stipend, and buy her a $26,000 BMW and thousands of dollars worth of furniture.
In his junior physics class, students had to give presentations on the workings of a mechanical device.
Adolescents and adults, including the elderly, can be vaccinated for pertussis with a different vaccine, known as Tdap.
"It was pretty obvious that generations had been using altered states of consciousness in music and in art, before us. . . . I didn't particularly write songs on psychedelics. But the experiences were so extraordinary, on mescaline and on peyote, that I wrote about them.
Crane plans to hire good people and hold them accountable. That is why he is certain that when the season starts he'll be able to back away from the spotlight.
The main reason for the "for sale" sign outside St. Louis' largest craft brewer is succession planning, they said. Schlafly,
He didn't leave for the NBA. He didn't ignore what everyone knew was obvious. He just walked back into the locker room after losing that game and announced he was determined to never to lose a big one again.
Still, as we shall see, there's reason to approach the latest study, by the Colorado School of Public Health, with caution.
øMost miles were accumulated in the more pleasant 3.8-liter version. Generally, it is smooth, inviting and quite luxurious in feel and persona.
"My best friend is a lesbian . . ."
At the table, I sat beside a man named Michael who was staying for a month. He had spent the past year driving across the country -- from California to Oregon to Arizona to Texas to Arkansas to Bloomington.
"Perrie made a great play along the wall and Bergie found me through the middle," Crombeen said. "It was a great pass. I just tried to get it by the defenseman and get it on net. I got lucky and it went in."
Mike Florio reports that former Colts general manager Chris Polian will join the Atlanta Falcons' personnel department. Florio writes, "Chris Polian rose through the ranks to become the Colts General Manager. His ascension was criticized by some within the organization as the product of nepotism."
Winners in the nine and 10 year-old division include: Kelly Hulme, Angela Russo, Aidan Lund, Cameron Adelseck, Kelly Hulme and Raul Vazquez.
It should not be difficult to look good at the Oscars.
Mark Merrill was 16 and pumping gas in 1970 when his parents fronted him $50 for a 1956 Beetle owned by a regular customer. It had a sunroof and an oval rear window, which to VW collectors are very big deals.
"I'm here for immigration rights, for equal rights for everyone, " he said. "My boyfriend is here with Occupy. We're all in this together."
Katz officially left the company on Dec. 31. She had been on A-B's top-level strategy committee since April 2002, and was the first woman to reach that level at Anheuser-Busch. She assumed the leadership role for the company's communications and consumer affairs departments in 2002. She also led the company's alcohol awareness and environmental outreach initiatives. In 2007, she was the company's most outspoken and aggressive spokesperson as it tried to refute claims that its caffeine-alcohol drinks appealed especially to minors.
Silkwood Boutique, 12325 S.W. Horizon Blvd., Beaverton, (503) 747-7041
Spring, you're our favorite. When you're here, the trees begin to bud and the wildflowers start to bloom. The birds sing their courtship songs as they stake out territory and attract mates.
Even when his heart and mind are in the right place, Strickland can't or won't be daring. He ran for governor in 2006 -- with this editorial page's support -- promising to overhaul public education. After more than two years of study, he unveiled a blueprint for Ohio's classrooms that fobbed off many of the toughest decisions, including how to pay for it all, on some future administration.
SEARCH FOR ANSWERS
And, please. Nobody really has 431 friends. Someone might have 431 people they know, kind of know or heard of once, but they do not have 431 friends. If Facebook had been around when Mother Teresa was alive, I doubt even she would have had 431 friends. And she was a really nice person.
When the game started, Kansas-Kentucky seemed it would put the finishing touch on a memorable night for college basketball. In the same building that increased the legends of countless NBA superstars, this was a stage set for the college game to take full advantage of the extended NBA lockout.
Andrea Barducci, president of Florence, heads the delegation.
Jenkins' contract could be similar to that of last year's 30th overall pick, Jets defensive end Muhammed Wilkerson, who landed a four-year, $7.4 million deal with a $3.9 million signing bonus. Although Wilkerson's deal is believed to have been above the new rookie salary scale, Purzley believes it won't create a roadblock for Jenkins' deal.
øBag a Ripka piece
12429 Glengate Dr, $70,000
For years, "Titanic" reigned as the single most expensive movie in Hollywood history -- and its most successful. It made more than $1.9 billion worldwide, according to Box Office Mojo. Those records were surpassed in 2009 by Cameron's sci-fi epic, "Avatar," which raked in $2.78 billion.
Pinterest is the fastest standalone site that comScore has tracked to hit the 10 million unique visitors, said Andrew Lipsman, the research firm's vice president of industry analysis.
Those reforms have included unexpected steps in recent months to release political prisoners, lift restrictions on the Internet and open the economy to more foreign investment.
IKB and a second bank, ABN Amro NV, lost a total of about $1 billion on the investments.
"I am not saying this to the prejudice of other candidates, I just know that there will be at least one strong Republican," Frost said of Wurzelbacher, who is expected to formally launch his campaign Tuesday in Toledo.
Weiss isn't on the Regis faculty, but he clearly does a lot of teaching on the baseball diamond.
Non-vintage Blason de Bourgogne Blanc de Noirs Crémant de
The shareholders' suit, filed Friday, lists as defendants the company's general counsel, Mark McGuire; two other top in-house lawyers; and Eaton's directors, including Chief Executive Alexander Cutler.
Christopher Murphy, D-Conn.
Cindy Hoye, the fair's executive director, noted that "hindsight is an incredible teacher."
(05-04) 00:41 PDT WASHINGTON (AP) --
CINCINNATI -- It is a battle that is pitting Republican against Republican.
øFreeMonee and Wrapp's redemption rates are nowhere near those of the other popular marketing option of the hour, daily deals, says Nita Rollins, a digital marketing expert at Resource Interactive. But it's offset by low risk for retailers, a hypertargeted approach and the fact that consumers buy more than the gift card is worth.
For example?
No further action was apparently taken, and Ruiz is not on a list of those Cook County prosecutors are currently seeking to have extradited from Mexico.
Then comes Dallas and, following its dramatic events, the book's unexpected treat: the chapter titled "EOB 274," which shows the new president, still ensconced in his ignoble VP's office (No. 274 in the Old Executive Office Building across the street from the White House), holding the United States government together single-handedly while people weep for his predecessor.
"If their objective was to keep them in the country, then they charge them with what they can at the time," Green said.
Jack waits for Jill: The daily fish count on the Washington side of Bonneville Dam recently showed minus one under the chinook column.
After the opening burst, Dixon helped put MU even more out of distance when he hit back-to-back 3-pointers before his highlight-reel lob to Marcus Denmon for a reverse layup that made it 35-12.
of Craig were given a 48-hour mandatory evacuation order Tuesday as floodwater from the Missouri River threatened the Holt County town of 300 people.
Initially, Chris and Julie had wanted the renovation to include a family room, but an addition would swallow up the treasured back yard. Instead of adding on, Nepp converted a main-floor master bedroom into a family room.
Vélib' allows people to pick up a bicycle at one location and return it to another. There are hundreds of Vélib' stations around the city (with more than 20,000 bikes), not to mention about 230 miles of bike lanes.
To save an imposing and ornate building that housed a Sears store for more than 40 years, they're asking people to boycott the company that has volunteered to redevelop a blighted part of Camden — the Campbell Soup Co.
Jewel-Osco parent Supervalu Inc. said Tuesday that it swung to a loss in the fourth quarter as a result of impairment charges and costs related to store closures and layoffs. But excluding those items, the company's results beat Wall Street's expectations, sending its shares up 15 percent.
2. Yield Wine Bar
Ford, on the other hand, should land in the winner's column, Magliano said, with the yen strengthening at just the right time.
All day Sundays-Thursdays, and until 7 p.m. Fridays and Saturdays: Pay $1 for sake, $4 for imported beer and $5 for sake bombs and Jäger bombs. Other specials also are available.
Delegate trackers for the Republican National Committee credit the front-runner with 478 of the 1,144 delegates needed to win. That's almost 100 fewer than the widely followed Associated Press projection.
The company declined to release the number of employees that would see salary reductions. About 2,200 people work at Sparrows Point.
Here were are: Friday afternoon, creeping up on quitting time. Here's your daily commuting preview, looking at weather, construction, road work, road kill and just about everything else that might affect your drive home tonight.
Additionally, Electric Entertainment, the production company behind "Leverage," has spent more than $78 million in Oregon over the past three years.
"Are we going to be able to hold onto our cherished brand, property values and quality of life or are we going to turn into a mini Las Vegas?" Crawford said. "We just have to find balance so we don't lose our path."
He said that "principles matter" while conceding that 800,000 Floridians were still looking for work in the state. "We believe in freedom. That's why we have bills like this," Scott added.
To the former Cleveland St. Joseph star, it just doesn't seem possible it happened so long ago.
Police are investigating whether Gilbert is one of the bodies discovered about three miles away. They were on a secluded section of Ocean Parkway on the south shore of Long Island.
Old: Freezer Popsicle maker
Fudge also is meeting with Bahraini officials "to discuss relations between Bahrain and the U.S as well as matters of mutual concern," Allen said. This suggests the kingdom's approach to human rights is almost certain to come up.
Among those who found a haven in Ethiopia is Benyam Bereket-Ab, who fled Naperville in January 2006 after he was charged with sexually assaulting his sister over two years, starting when she was in fifth grade.
Also charged was a top official in the longshoremen's union, Nunzio LaGrasso, 60, of Florham Park, and his nephew, Newark police officer Alan Marfia, 40, of Kenilworth. Their cases are still pending, the release said.
Treat said Faye was unconscious and breathing when police and firefighters arrived. She was rushed to OHSU Hospital, where she remains under care today.
Four lawsuits have been filed, and more are expected.
After lunching on chicken curry salad, those at Friday's meeting heard a 10-minute presentation from Zuckerberg, followed by a 35-minute question-and-answer session that included queries about Facebook's future advertising plans and its recent $1 billion purchase of photo sharing app developer Instagram.
Within 12 hours all fighting along the 155-mile battlefront would stop. The communists also agreed to release 3,500 American prisoners of war within a week.
The first attempt to secure the Upper Marlboro grant came in 2006, when Transportation Secretary Robert L. Flanagan was under fire in the legislature over an unrelated issue, lawyers said. Prosecutors said Currie leaned on the secretary during a private meeting, telling Flanagan "you need friends" in the General Assembly.
“I have very little social life right now but my friends understand,” she said. “They’re excited for me.”
The fire swept through one neighborhood and killed Sam and Linda "Moaneti" Lucas, ages 77 and 76, and Ann Appel, 51. The fire destroyed 27 homes and scorched 4,140 acres.
The A's arrived in Beantown after a demoralizing loss Sunday against the Baltimore Orioles, when they coughed up a two-run lead in the ninth inning. They lost the series opener to the Red Sox 11-6 but took the final two games as their pitching clamped down on the major leagues' highest-scoring club.
Hours: 11:30 a.m.-10 p.m. Monday-Thursday; 11:30 a.m.-11 p.m. Friday; 4-11 p.m. Saturday; 4-9 p.m. Sunday.
Crow said the current system is not good for the Pac-12 Conference or for college football as a whole. The conference, of which ASU is a member, automatically sends a contender to a BCS bowl game each year.
There is some murky connection between miniaturization and megalomania — Hitler loved his models of Germania, the city he wanted to replace Berlin with, and kept going over them even as the Red Army closed in. But there’s something to the idea that these statuettes were goads to virtue, too: It sort of depends on how you see the Romans. Think big, little man. Or be forgotten.
Last Tuesday, South used a five-run fifth inning to beat Lafayette 8-6. The following day, the Patriots scored three times in the top of the seventh to pull out a 6-4 win over the Lancers.
One of the friends I met downtown Saturday night is a successful sales representative for Bayer HealthCare Pharmaceuticals. He was visiting from Pennsylvania with his 15-year old son, both of whom were excited about attending the Sunday Cavaliers game.
Unemployment nationally stood at 8.3 percent in February.
Once again Art Modell has no chance of getting in the Hall Of Fame.
In the courtroom, I couldn't spot anybody in his corner, aside from his wife and a couple of his children.
Speaking of which, Blade is a different story. There would be nothing more awesome than being a cool, superhuman martial arts machine who kills vampires with a sword and dresses like John Shaft. Unless Superman flies around the Earth a couple of dozen times and turns you into David Lee Roth, circa 1981.
A stage for speakers and thousands of folding chairs were set up on a field near the memorial along with large TV screens. Most of the 10,000 chairs set out appeared to be full. Many other people were standing.
Belly up to the bar with an Obolon and drink in the music: A Ukrainian pop hit plays for every English-language tune that comes on the sound system. On Friday and Saturday nights, Kraine Station doubles as a raucous sing-along piano bar, too.
For at least a decade, educators across the country have discussed ways to alter the senior year, according to a 2001 report by a commission appointed by the U.S. Department of Education.
If Howard tells them he wants to move on to L.A., then the Magic have to consider a deal to receive compensation, and you could do worse than, say, Bynum.
In exchange for the additional payments, to be made over 10 years, Penn National will pay Ohio's Commercial Activity Tax -- 26 cents on every $100 for the right to do business in Ohio -- on casino revenue after winnings have been paid, instead of on all wagering.
The Nets will play their last game in New Jersey Monday night, and Thorn will be at the Prudential Center with his current team, the Philadelphia 76ers. He has thought often about how this day could have been avoided, but now wonders if this team was simply dead upon arrival.
A hallway outside Stinchfield's bedroom was blocked off and turned into storage for the landlord, so his bedroom had just one way out, a code violation, according to Nisja. But Stinchfield worried that if he made a stink about problems like that, his rent would go up.
Clevelanders are a relatively conservative, budget-conscious group. Among our favorite vacation activities: camping, hiking and lounging on a beach. (Not as high? Relaxing at a spa, skiing, diving and shopping.)
Royal Marines sailed to the island and built a camp. So too did hundreds of U.S. Army soldiers. Both sides were waiting for someone to fire the first shot, but it never came. Over a period of 13 years, through negotiation, the conflict was resolved peacefully. Now, 150 years later, English Camp and American Camp have been restored as key parts of the San Juan Island National Historical Park, where celebrations this summer will mark the sesquicentennial of a most unusual war.
But in his statement upholding the termination, Palacios says Ibarra not only used excessive force but that he was "dishonest" with Internal Affairs investigators and the Personnel Commission.
At the top of her motivations: "Because of my children, because they had (diabetes and obesity) on both sides of the family, I wanted to prove to them that they didn't have to be a victim and they could do something about it."
But the 23-year-old understands nobody wants to hear his problems when they wait 30 minutes after a game just for a chance to say hello.
This much is also clear to me after all these years: That the real test of an athlete's mettle is what he represents off the court, off the field, beyond the ring. That is the true heart of a champion, the heart of a man.
How much: $13 for general admission and $9 for seniors and students. Call (212) 875-5601 or visit filmlinc.com.
Uplifting stuff, Hatcher said.
Their positive thinking would spread and change the thinking in the region.
Scouting may not wish to acknowledge this cultural shift, but I guarantee you, within the 2.7 million young men engaged in Scouting's programs, there are many who now or will later identify as gay.
The settlement provides for oversight measures, including an outside monitor who would ensure that banks live up to the deal and enforce penalties for banks that fail to distribute the money within three years.
The suspensions push back the windows for safe prescribed fires until conditions are favorable — possibly until late fall.
Hops is honored to lead the first class.
“I kind of honed in some skills last year, but it’s a different level playing up on varsity and doing the faceoffs,” he said. “There has been a bit of a learning curve.”
A few months ago, local rap artists T'Killa and Rick Ruin wrote, produced and performed "Make 'em Pay," an ode to Misny and his "I'll Make Them Pay" catch phrase.
Kitzhaber said the investment board wants to make achievement compacts next year with districts and universities that will define the outcomes the state wants for the money it invests in them.
"There's not an infinite set of institutions. It's not as difficult as one might think for presidents to understand the implications of various decisions. ... It is a group that is perfectly capable of making very sophisticated judgments."
The St. Petersburg Times is ranking the top scoring plays in the history of the area pro teams and college football programs.
"We were talking about the possibility of having another kid right away and then getting married so we can have two kids close in age," Cavallari told the magazine at the time.
Riley praised Crichton for working hard to increase his strength so he could make a bid for a starting spot.
In Thursday's final at the U.S. championships at Hayward Field, Flanagan bolted to the front in the first 100 meters and then pulled away and ran comfortably to the win in 30 minutes, 59.97 seconds.
"Having that name alone on your lineup card is huge," Freese said. "When Albert's not in there, it's definitely a different take. It takes away the thunder, so to speak.
Three fabric panels -- together the size of Autzen Stadium's video board -- drape on the walls and floor as a dozen stocking-footed volunteers tiptoe around them, some painting with long-necked rollers, others resting with a bite of pizza or a sip of beer.
-- 130 units of affordable housing plus support services.
"Perhaps the opening of a hamburger restaurant is the solution to the problem of golf widows," she said.
I think we should all wait to see how the European financial crisis plays out before we decide who really has the better economic mousetrap, don't you?
Fortunately, the tree rebounded and re-established a lush full canopy -- a beautiful sight to see even without being in bloom. This winter it was not damaged, and I was thrilled to see that all of the branches had large bloom clusters at their tips and the large, magenta blooms were starting to open.
There's no question that he'll still be a premier player next season, but he needs to be a little more realistic. He's coming off a difficult season in which his interception total was way down and he had problems making tackles at the end of the season because of his neck issues. And, let's be honest, it's going to be hard for Ozzie Newsome and Steve Bisciotti to justify making him one of the highest-paid players in the sport when he probably was the fifth-best player on the Ravens defense last year.
It took two trials for prosecutors to snare Blagojevich. His first ended deadlocked with jurors agreeing on just one of 24 counts — that Blagojevich lied to the FBI. Jurors at his retrial convicted him on 17 of 20 counts, including bribery and attempted extortion.
Assistant general manager Gord Ash said that, even though management had been confident of a good outcome, he admitted he had looked ahead to see who would be the Brewers' 51st opponent this season. "Dodgers," said Ash.
Hardly anyone is calling it the “veto session” this year, however. That’s because lawmakers haven’t completed much legislation. No legislation, no vetoes. No vetoes, nothing to override.
"I'll never be able to work again, no matter what they decide," says Harris, a former window glazier. "I want to work. And I've been made to feel like a cheat and a beggar."
According to East Orange police, the shootings occurred around 5 p.m. in a first-floor apartment at 377 N. Grove St., a two-family house, said Sgt. Andrew DiElmo, a police spokesman.
I'm not going to pretend I understand the complexities of that strange relationship. What I will say is that this may explain why I'm very familiar with the Holocaust story, which cost the lives of over six million Jews, at the hands of our enemy. It is a story that must be remembered. It may also explain why, until recently, I was not aware of the human toll, tens of millions of Russian lives lost, at the hands of their own leaders beginning with Lenin and most notoriously at the hands of Stalin; the hands of our ally during much of the time of their persecution.
"That was the turning point," Peveto says. "Companies have law firms, and the community just isn't speaking the same language."
McAllister, the medical-marijuana attorney, said he sees the talk of possible medical-marijuana prosecutions as mere bluster.
Others are even less optimistic. Yale economics professor Robert Shiller -- of Standard & Poor's/Case-Shiller home price index fame -- told Reuters Insider this week that a housing rebound could take at least a generation.
Shortly after Hofmann died in October 2009, the sisters began searching the Internet for any mention of their uncle. They found Taylan’s website, which included information on Zanger provided by Sakaida.
The competitions take on the appearance of a hockey game, NASCAR event, pep rally and rock concert combined, with flashing lights, scoreboards and loud music.
Consumers who pay for a magazine through the company and then change their minds may be charged a $20 cancellation fee – another red flag.
Declue, 73, had lived in the first block of Wayside Drive. Authorities said the windows to her home were closed and the air conditioner was off. They said decomposition of the body, which was found Thursday, and a stack of accumulated mail indicated she had been dead for as long as two weeks.
How did you hear about the Habitat job opening? Did you reach out initially?
Monsoon storms hit opposite sides of metro Phoenix on Tuesday, flooding streets and cutting off power for thousands of residents.
launched an investigation into a shot fired by Pine Lawn's police chief last weekend that did not hit anyone but raised questions about his conduct during the incident.
Bryan Clauson, Noblesville, is the other champion trying the 500 for the first time. He is a two-time USAC overall champion, and he won the past two national midget titles. His pairing with Newgarden at Sarah Fisher Hartman Racing is part of IndyCar's Road to Indy program.
Position 12: Janice R. Wilson
And that uncertainty – "Wait, is that supposed to be funny?" – makes the movie an unsatisfying if often surprising experience, a less warm and fuzzy "Parenthood" from a director long removed from his warm and fuzzy years.
Red Wings forward Johan Franzen already is showing signs of a tough first-round series against the Predators.
Department of Education officials would not provide specifics of the speech.
Bolton indicated she was leading toward Chilakamarri's argument, saying she is "bound by" precedents set by higher courts.
Iglesias, who grew up in Miami, has drawn inspiration from sources as varied as Mexican balladeers Marco Antonio Solis and Juan Gabriel, although he confesses "one of the first artists I admired was Bruce Springsteen." Not exactly a rocker, his most popular songs, like the ballads "Experiencia Religiosa" (Religious Experience) and "Hero," as well as dance-pop anthems like "Bailamos" (Let's Dance) appeal to the Latino in you -- they're all about romance and gyrating hips.
Another good pairing is a large oil, “Portrait” by Hannah Batren, showing a woman looking over her shoulder. Batren’s bold energetic strokes, her choice of intense colors that accentuate the stark whites of the woman’s eyes, all suggest fear. Next to that is hung Skyla Pojednic’s “Judith and Child,” a large black and white photograph of a seated woman holding a child. The child’s face is buried against the chest of the woman whose facial expression is watchful and attentive.
Calming influence: Joni Nowak, the co-founder of Minutes Matter and a veteran trauma nurse who’s been sav´ing lives around here for more than 30 years.
The appearance moves Altman's streak of postseason appearances up to 14 years. His Creighton Bluejays played in the CIT last season, and Altman is clear he has higher goals.
For instance, even the most well-meaning pastors and preachers I've known (yes, myself included, for which I can only ask God's forgiveness) sometimes fall into the trap of making sweeping claims about how "the Jews (or the Israelites or the Pharisees) believed this but Jesus taught that." We are trying to explain what is special and unique about Jesus but to do so we set up a straw man and we end up giving the impression that the Hebrew Scriptures and Jewish traditions do not teach compassion, or care for the poor and the stranger or whatever the point of our sermon is that day.
What's your favorite Cleveland landmark and why?
The Giants traveled cross-country to San Francisco once earlier this season, a Week 10 loss they hope was the opposite outcome of Sunday’s NFC Championship Game. They believe they are a different team now, and they’re also staying in a different hotel.
Senate President Sweeney pushed a health benefit reform proposal that he announced Tuesday, and Assembly Speaker Sheila Oliver said a proposal will be coming out of the Assembly within the next few weeks.
We sailed on a small catamaran for an hour almost every day, and snorkeled off the beach to view an array of tropical fish of various sizes and colors. Leisurely days and warm nights with quiet dinners, followed by moonlight walks under the stars, rekindled a romantic feeling that would have been impossible in a crowded restaurant on a cold, wintry night back home.
William M. and Helen Wagner to Claude E. Wagner, two lots on Meadow Lane, gift; fair cash value, $100,000.
In 1997, during a sabbatical in Europe, Weiss covered news events in Serbia, Bosnia, Poland, Hungary, Germany and other parts of Eastern and Western Europe for the Sun-Times. ‘‘The New Europe,'' her five-part series inspired by that year abroad, was nominated for several major awards.
It is a challenge for President Barack Obama, who faces a tough fight for re-election next year, though signs of a modest improvement could keep the Federal Reserve on the sidelines as it considers whether monetary policy needs to be looser to aid growth.
To be sure, much of the growth is being driven by a few giant companies. Strip Apple out of the S&P 500, and earnings growth would drop to 3.6 percent, Butters calculates. And banks, which have also turned in strong first-quarter earnings, were helped by one-time items like accounting adjustments.
Under New Jersey law, a gambling business is considered illegal if operated by five or more people for more than 30 days without a license. The business must also take in more than $2,000 a day.
“Don’t make it sound so bitter,” Buck said. “It is what it is.”
Sometimes we can.
Nutrition and public policy expert Marion Nestle answers readers' questions in this monthly column written exclusively for The Chronicle. E-mail your questions to food@sfchronicle.com, with "Marion Nestle" in the subject line.
Browns 26, Ravens 23
Two couples I know are trying to sell city houses they have owned for more than three decades. The houses are historic, and conventional wisdom when they bought them as shells was to restore them without compromising their architectural integrity.
And this year, with the complaints about a head shot surrounding Hawks rookie Andrew Shaw and not himself, Torres said his mind-set is on staying disciplined and not retaliating.
The judge said he hoped the sentence would send a message to the gang community. He directly addressed gang members who he suspected were in the court room.
Butler strengthens the Atlantic 10s western edge, which also includes Xavier, Dayton and St. Louis.
"There's not a lot of programs like this in the county," she said. "I hope they have fun and I hope they learn how to present themselves so they're not afraid to perform in front of other people."
In fact, during the drive back to Granite Bay, Bomhoff made an observation to his father that might surprise some. He said he thinks the Western States 100 Mile Endurance Run (from Squaw Valley to Auburn) might be more enervating than Badwater.
“That song used to scare me when I was 14 years old,” said Joe Satriani after his hands flew up and down his guitar neck as he played Jimi Hendrix’s staggeringly complex “Third Stone From the Sun,” Wednesday night. “And it still scares me.”
Low key: Giovanni's Shrimp Truck on Oahu's North Shore may have spawned a bevy of nearby imitators, but Savage Shrimp at the intersection of Lawai and Ho'onani roads is the only one of its kind on Kauai. I was glad to learn recently that the owner, who simply goes by Susan, has vowed she won't let the major construction zone across the street drive her away. Susan serves two kinds of shrimp: a very garlicky scampi and a slightly less garlicky Brazilian style with coconut milk, both served over rice, for $10.
So, when news arrived of pilots retiring early to protect their pension accounts, it set tongues wagging, noted analyst Bob McAdoo of Avondale Partners in Kansas City. People remembered how Delta Airlines pilots grabbed their retirement money and bailed out just before Delta went broke in 2005.
His first full-length play was "Assisted Living." Rubin submitted it to the Neil Simon Festival's "New Play Contest" and it won the drama award. "Assisted Living" will be part of the festival's 2011 season of staged readings and will have its reading Aug. 1 in Cedar City, Utah.
The speed work, the weight training, the conditioning, the yoga, the flexibility drills, the pool work. The combine. Notre Dame's pro day. And that work looks as if it will pay off.
Even he has to look at what the Rangers are doing — and what they didn’t do at trading deadline yesterday to screw up their chemistry — and think ahead to what could be a fantastic spring for hockey fans in this market should these two teams meet again when it matters.
“They’re doing construction on the building, so people probably chalked it up to that. But I have never felt a shake like that,” said Lieb. “Everybody’s coming out of their office to see what was going on, and nobody knows what to do.”
Over the next five hours, Amed Villa and others used a forklift inside the warehouse to load numerous boxes of drugs, including the schizophrenia drug Zyprexa, the antidepressant Prozac and the chemotherapy drug Gemzar, into a tractor-trailer truck, officials charge. During that time, they say, Amed Villa touched a water bottle that had been stored within the warehouse; he reportedly left that bottle inside the warehouse when he departed.
"One Day" offers none of these things. Emma and Dexter meet, and meet, and meet. She is a waitress and wannabe writer. He is a tacky TV host. They love each other but mostly as friends, and Emma has strict platonic rules to follow when they are together. Emma and Dexter lack chemistry and they find that their visits often lack luster. (If they're bored by their recurring encounters, imagine how we feel?)
This is where the built-in strength of “In the Heights” comes in. Granted, the mawkish book defies credibility, especially in the weaker second act. But the ensemble structure safeguards it from any weak links. If someone’s not quite on the level, he’s not onstage for long. And it’s a delight to watch pros such as Andréa Burns — who hits her comic targets like a laser-guided missile — steal scenes again and again.
When you're out there with Gerald, do you think it makes it easier for you on the offensive end or the defensive end?
Instead, you'll most likely be reminded of the other products Sun Cities sells: annuities.
Enter Corey. After the Jacksonville-area state attorney gave the evidence a second look, she not only recommended an arrest but on the more serious charge of second-degree murder, which state law defines as "an act imminently dangerous to another and evincing a depraved mind regardless of human life."
At the urging of his brother-in-law, Kevin Gill, and dear friend Rob Griffin, Boyle traveled to a Marian apparition site in Medjugorje, Bosnia and Herzegovina, where he spent 10 days engaged in a state of meditation through prayer, even praying on top of a mountain.
Soaring Sounds in a Sacred Space: "Feast of the Annunciation," featuring Schola with Orchestra, 7 p.m. Mon. Christ Church Grosse Pointe, 61 Grosse Pointe Blvd., Grosse Pointe Farms. 313-885-4841. Free.
European-based horses were shut out during the six-race Breeders' Cup card, while Canada and Saudi Arabia had a win apiece in front of 40,677 on a sunny but chilly day.
Dance St. Louis director Michael Uthoff believes that "Billy Elliot" has considerable appeal for two audiences that don't always go for the same things, the dance audience and the Broadway audience. "It reminds me of the end of the Cold War, when dance did so much to bring the East and the West together," he said. "This show breaks down barriers."
For now, listen to what each one is saying and either tell them to try and work it out between the two of them, give them an example of what might happen next or a use combination of the two. They will eventually learn what is important to tell you as an adult in charge and also be able to negotiate whatever is necessary to keep the peace between the two of them.
Meg Whitman says her personal wealth leaves her unbeholden to special interests, and that she'll use that independence along with a high-powered professional's business approach to rescue California. Her plan includes shutting down unnecessary boards and commissions, establishing a budget cap, and improving the business climate.
I wasn't there." She said she is confident that their girl, 10, and boys, 13 and 9, were not harmed.
Paul not only pioneered multitrack recording and guitar reverb, he also created the first solid-body guitar that carried his name.
And when he gave Janis Joplin a ride in his luxury car, she was inspired to write “Mercedes Benz,” right before she died.
2007 Graffigna "Reserve" Malbec, San Juan, Argentina ($12-$16) - The color is deep ruby in the bowl with a purple hue surrounding the rim. In reds, this color tone indicates youth, depth and warmer climates. It also is an indication of "Bordeaux" varietals, which are Cabernet Sauvignon, Merlot, Cabernet Franc, Petite Verdot and Malbec. These five reds are the blending grapes used in Bordeaux, France. What's interesting is that Argentina has made a name for itself using Malbec, and it has been very successful here. The aroma is muted and dusty. The taste is lush and soft. Tannins are fine and well integrated, and the fruit in the finish dominates with a focused ripeness. 87 points.
The stated goal for St. Mary's is to return to the playoffs. It's been five years since the team tasted the postseason. That's what drove those seniors to kill it in the offseason.
With her free throw at the 7:44 mark of the second quarter, Michelle Snow became the seventh player in WNBA history to reach 2800 points, 2000 rebounds and 300 blocks in her career … Chatman inserted Vandersloot and Cathrine Kraayeveld into the starting lineup for Dominique Canty and Tamera Young.
KENT, Ohio -- Police in Kent are dispersing large crowds near campus, after fights broke out an at annual event called College Fest. Students attending the large party have tweeted that beer bottles were being thrown and ambulances were dispatched to the scene.
Texas Rangers outfielder Josh Hamilton has long captivated baseball with his dramatic rise from drug addict to superstar. Now, he again is poised to leave everyone in suspense.
It is fitting that Summitt's coaching career and the groundbreaking law known as Title IX share almost exactly the same historical space. The law that has brought millions of girls and women into sports was signed by President Richard Nixon in June 1972. Summitt became head coach at Tennessee in May 1974. She earned a salary of $250 a month and, among her duties, she had to wash the players' uniforms, which had been purchased with the profits from a doughnut sale.
How else could you explain the fact that county supervisors, over the years, have steadily decreased support for the parkway and other parks? Why have supervisors been allowed to permit new houses and mansions that loom over scenic parts of the parkway?
Many families fall into an income gap, "earning too much to qualify for public insurance but not enough to afford private insurance for the entire family," the study found.
Republicans said legislators had no choice, because Nixon said he would cut the home-care funding if the Legislature had included it.
To make his point, he cites the theoretical case of an aging uncle who feels lousy but whose testosterone level is not clinically low. Testosterone therapy might make him feel better, but taking it could put him and his doctor at risk of prosecution, Collins said.
"So we've got to find a way to make up the difference," Moran said.
Andrew Pitts smacked a leadoff double, and Charlie Kretschmer followed with a walk. Paul Simon's grounder got through Jake Burger at third, but Gilkey made a strong throw in to home plate. The runner stopped at third, so CBC catcher Joe Schrimpf tried to nail courtesy runner Mitch Klug at second after he had rounded the base by a big margin.
As an interior designer, it never hurts when your client has a bunch of really cool stuff to start with. Iconic and whimsical items are a great starting point for pulling color and style elements into the larger design scheme, and that process is more fun when those things have personal meaning for the homeowner.
In 2005, she started going to the gym again, transforming her body into a mass of muscle to compete in a bodybuilding championship.
I found a few of these hotels in 2009, but this list reflects 18 years of traveling (including a few revisits). Each lodging has surely changed since I checked out, some substantially. (Most regrettably, my favorite under-$100 lodging, the Hotel de la Pelissaria in Saint-Cirq-Lapopie, France, closed late in 2009, so I had to strike it from the list.) But great places tend to endure. Along with my photos from original visits, I've included updates here, including what these places now cost. (Brace yourself.)
Eileen Healy, a Redwood City marriage therapist, has counseled a few couples with food issues. There was the man and woman whose marriage was falling apart. They came to her office with hopes that she could put it back together. Healy probed. They opened up. It turns out the man was deeply hurt that his wife wouldn't cook for him.
Winner of this year's first Planeta-Casa de América Ibero-American Narrative Prize for "El Enigma de París." "I'm finishing with filmmaker Juan Pablo Buscarini the screenplay for the movie ‘El inventor de juegos,' based on a novel of mine."
21217 NW Cannes Dr; 2,026 square feet; on 6/15/2011 for $259,900
There's something happily messy about it all, but if you can set theatrical expectations aside there's no need to call in a cleaner.
Hawes fired an airball next time down and there was a collective groan from the crowd.
Coyotes President Mike Nealy said the franchise plans to capitalize on the attention from such new fans.
It will be sold as an e-book and also as a traditional hardback volume.
Unable to bridge differences between religious and secular elements in his coalition, Netanyahu said Monday he would hold a new parliamentary election in September — more than a year ahead of schedule. Then, in a stunning last-minute reversal, he reached a deal to bring the centrist Kadima into his government, shoring up the coalition and averting the need for elections.
The items were confiscated. Police have not released the man's name.
Hahn Estates Winery
David Shipper, who owns and operates 42 cemeteries across the country, said his typical mausoleum has about 500 spaces.
Then there’s the irritating size of cars in America. Huge. Huge, like the one that must have hit my car on a parking lot the day after I returned. It hit it so hard that my car moved into the adjacent parking space. The driver didn’t even leave a note. Why does that not surprise me?
Cowboys
— As of 6 a.m., there’s construction on Route 42 southbound from Exit 12, Route 41 in Deptford Township to north of Exit 10B, Route 681/Lower Landing Road in Gloucester Township. Right lane is closed until 2 p.m. Use caution.
"They liked the permanence of the strong, chunky elements and wanted to build a home that felt like it had a sense of history, like those old WPA national park structures," she said.
It could not be determined if McSwain has an attorney.
The injured sustained gunshot wounds to their arms, legs and other areas of their bodies. All 11 of the victims were taken to St. Elizabeth's Health Center, and eight of them have since been treated and released.
At this point booms are containing the leak, the Coast Guard says, with just small patches of sheen seen Monday. The Coast Guard has collected 1,450 gallons of oil and diesel since the spill began from aboard the barge and in oil-absorbent booms surrounding the ship.
Hey, Tony: Please pass on to the Browns organization that most fans find the Peyton Hillis contract situation ridiculous. Between the contract situation and benching him, it looks as though they are heading in another direction. That will be the last straw for a lot of fans, including me. I will root for whatever team Hillis ends up on, even if it is the Steelers. I would gladly fire Mike Holmgren, Tom Heckert and Pat Shurmur if it means keeping Hillis. -- Jared Pelcic, Elyria
It is opening day for the Fog, which is most likely the only club among 16 in the Northern California Rugby Football Union Division III that is sponsored by a "bear bar." The home pitch is on Treasure Island, where the Fog field an A-side, a B-side, and a sideline-side for social members who wear the colors without having to get out into the mayhem.
It only took me another five minutes to realize I was analyzing my own bracket.
"He's here, and the police are here too," Allen says, about three and a half minutes into a call that began at 8:39 p.m.
Walking is probably the least intimidating form of exercise there is. The Queen of England walks. Coal miners walk. Golfers walk ... except if they're actually playing golf.
People who saw his driver’s license looked at him as if he had two heads — and in a sense, he did.
I see people taking clips of your endorsements into the ballot booth. What do you think about that?
But along with anger, Sacramento should show a little humility. We've seen this switcheroo from the Maloofs before. As the idiom goes, "Fool me once, shame on you. Fool me twice, shame on me."
I like shows. I like certificates. I wouldn't mind being somebody's media partner. I called the number and left a message. That was more than a week ago. Nobody has called me back.
mayor the approval to sign the
So it was on to Plan B. The result is an open tryout on a big stage against Los Angeles stars Andrew Bynum and Pau Gasol.
As it plans future stations, Metro should begin pairing transit specialists like Parsons with architects who can bring a new level of sophistication to the task. That would be a first step in banishing for good the idea that impressive station architecture is a luxury that Metro — and by extension L.A. — can't afford. If Metro had used a single highly ambitious design template for the Red and Gold lines, after all, it would have saved money and improved the level of architecture.
You can check out the Boot Camp round on 'The X Factor' Wednesday and Thursday night at 8ET/7CT only on Fox.
Jonathan suffers frequent seizures and can't always control his hands. He's prone to outbursts so violent that Danielle once called police to subdue him.
Each day, nearly 100 trucks drive on to the site to collect tin, aluminum, copper, brass and concrete. They make their way to the East Bank of the Flats, where the material is crushed, then circle back.
Proud brother that he is, Baltimore's Rev. Jamal Bryant, who's been getting plenty of airtime lately leading the national Trayvon Martin protests, wanted to make sure his sister Thelma Bryant-Davis got some attention, too, with her new show called "Love Addiction."
Okay, so I haven't won a Pulitzer (Robinson) or had a movie made out of my book (Safran Foer). But I'll be in, of all places, Grand Rapids, Michigan, at the same time they will be. Let me know if you will be too.
The government continues to be able to borrow the amounts it needs, and sold more bonds than it had targeted. But its borrowing costs have been on the rise and those higher costs add to doubts about the government's ability to finance itself entirely via bond offerings.
“It’s really a recovery thing at my age,” he said. “This is the first injury I’ve had in my college career.”
"There is tremendous nostalgia, right now, for an imagined past in which everything we ate was pure and came straight out of some magically clean Earth," Glassner says. "That never existed -- except in our imagination."
Carolina at Houston, 1 p.m.
Then again, you might just surmise this would be a particularly short column if that were indeed its intended direction.
Until now, the owners have appeared unified, from when they opted out to when they locked out. But as negotiations have ramped up, a faction of owners skeptical about the dynamics of a new deal has appeared. That will make next week’s owners’ meetings critical as July approaches.
The justices will meet behind closed doors Friday to discuss the entire case and cast their votes. If five or more believe the new law imposes a tax, they will write an opinion to explain their decision. The constitutionality of the individual mandate would remain unsolved. However, the justices would still be free to rule on the states’ rights challenge to the Medicaid expansion, the issue to be debated Wednesday.
For Salisbury, the need to improve his game was apparent. That insight powered a determined offseason work schedule.
"We were kind of ahead of the curve," Clarke said. "Now there are a lot of companies making wool, which is good. I really noticed it kicking in by 2002 to 2004. SmartWool was the granddaddy and it had branched out from socks. People really started believing in it."
Soon I was in the tasting room and looking contented too.
TechShop is using 12,000 square feet of space in the 38,000-square-foot building and installing more than $1 million worth of tools and software.
And in this one, we found demonic girls, possessed books, crucified dogs, people hanging from trees, burning towns (one of the few moments of color - flickering orange and red, startling against the black), and zitty kids in Danzig T-shirts who are eager to tell us all about the mass murder that went down in the old town park. (Say it with me: "It's only a piece of paper, it's only a piece of paper.")
After little more than a year in his new job, Franklin said he’s not yet ready for major announcements, but that virtually “every waking moment is occupied in bringing all of this to fruition. It’s an incredible challenge, but what an opportunity.”
Spring revealed the tandem steal could be an option just as it underscored Matheny's plan to green-light a more aggressive approach to baserunning.
Two plays late in the game stood out in my mind. First was a top of the key jumper with 48 seconds to play, and the second was on Portland’s next offensive possession and it was a back down turnaround against Taj Gibson. The combination of shots showed just how far LA has come in the last few months. The top of the key jumper used to be his standby, and as he’s gone inside more and more, the jumper has started to leave him. Monday he drilled the jumper, then came down the court on the next possession and showed a truly excellent low post move. Also, LA knew that he hit both shots as soon as they left his hands. When he’s playing with that kind of confidence he’s scary.
Wine has been produced in the Santa Cruz Mountains since the late 1880s, but during Prohibition, apple trees largely supplanted grape vines. Today, with land values tethered to the temperate coast to the west and the Silicon Valley to the east, most wineries buy their fruit from growers elsewhere. Alfaro has planted only 30 of his 75 acres, in part because the varied microclimates and terrain make grape growing tricky.
It isn't like the Texans will play in a packed Reliant Stadium. Or start Sunday's game with the score 31-10. Or play Cincinnati again.
Seau, 43, spent the final four seasons of his 20-year career with the Patriots, and he was known for his high-energy, hard-hitting play — a style that helped him amass 1,526 tackles and 56 sacks in his career.
David Wood's 10-part series on the struggles of wounded American soldiers returning home from Iraq and Afghanistan, "Beyond the Battlefield," won the Pulitzer for national reporting. It's a first for a reporter from the AOL-owned Internet news site.
Hours: noon to 3 p.m. and 5 p.m. to close Wednesday to Saturday. Sunday brunch is 10 a.m. to 2 p.m., and Sunday Supper is 5-9 p.m. (reservations required)
LAMBERTVILLE – A Lambertville resident was the victim of a strong-arm robbery inside her house last weekend, police said.
Police say Green was lured to a Savannah house he owned by Wheeler and Lakeya Jenkins under the guise of renting the home. Once Green arrived, police say Wheeler shot him, rifled through his pockets and fled with Jenkins.
But the problems facing both Social Security and Medicare could be significantly reduced by decisive action now. Neither party has shown much stomach for that, although we do give credit to U.S. Rep. Paul Ryan, R-Wis., who has had the courage to propose ideas for reforming entitlements and has taken the subsequent political knocks as a result.
"The majority of surveyed Joplin residents did not immediately go to shelter upon hearing the initial warning," the report said. "Instead, most chose to further clarify and assess their risk by waiting for, actively seeking and filtering additional information."
I didn’t know the Jets might need to kick in an extra $5 million while pondering the wisdom of the deal (half of which they’ll have to pay), but it isn’t in my job description to know that.
Police Chief Bret Smith said the death was particularly tragic because of the random nature of the blast. "We really feel like the victim, Ivan, really was a victim," Smith said. "He was just in the wrong place at the wrong time."
"I don't really keep up with my receipts, but in the last two weeks, I've paid $21 for $260 worth of merchandise," Ortiz said. "On health and beauty products, I have a 90 percent savings."
"I burned my bangs, that's about it," John Cayne said as passenger planes passed overhead and landed about 100 yards away.
"Part of it is that we need to have a strong bench of women, and I’m not sure we have been doing a good enough job across the state in either party to make sure that happens," she said.
